The information presented in this section will provide you with a greater understanding of topics related to laws and ethics applicable to General Lines of insurance. This chapter is not required for your state exam, but is included as part of your producer prelicensing education.

Any individual or entity that transacts insurance in the state of Florida is required to be licensed; the license type required is based on the lines of insurance transacted.

Upon completion of this chapter, you will:

Have working knowledge about the jurisdiction of duties and responsibilities of Florida’s Chief Financial Officer (CFO), the Department of Financial Services (DFS), the Office of Insurance Regulation (OIR), and the Office of Financial Regulation (OFR);
Be familiar with the licensing requirements of general lines agents, as well as those of insurance agencies, including the grounds for refusal, suspension, or revocation of insurance licenses and appointments;
Understand the duties of licensed and unlicensed personnel in the insurance industry;
Have completed a review of advertising and recordkeeping requirements, the Florida Insurance Guaranty Association (FIGA), and details about Department communication;
Understand and be able to explain updated Florida laws and federal laws as they pertain to Florida licensees;
Be conversant in the DFS’ code of ethics and related rules, marketing regulations and ethical guidelines, industry products and suitability with respect to sales and service, unfair methods of competition and unfair/deceptive acts and practices in Florida, and required premium discounts; and
Have completed a review of new and other important terminology that applies to Florida licensees, unauthorized products and entities involved in Florida commerce, and recent violations and enforcement actions of Florida licensees.

Regulatory Awareness
1. Jurisdiction of Duties and Responsibilities
The insurance industry in the United States is regulated primarily by the states. In the state of Florida, the insurance regulatory bodies include

The Department of Financial Services (DFS);
The Office of Insurance Regulation (OIR); and
The Office of Financial Regulation (OFR).
Department of Financial Services (DFS)
The Department of Financial Services (DFS) was established in 2003 by merging the state’s Departments of Insurance, Treasury, Banking and Finance, and State Fire Marshal. The DFS consists of 14 divisions and several specialized offices for the purpose of carrying out the statutory duties of the state of Florida.

The service divisions of the DFS include

Consumer Services;
Fiscal integrity (formerly Accounting and Auditing);
Funeral, Cemetery, and Consumer Services;
Insurance Agent and Agency Services;
Investigative and Forensic Services (formerly Insurance Fraud);
Public Assistance Fraud;
Rehabilitation and Liquidation;
Risk Management;
Treasury;
State Fire Marshal; and
Workers Compensation.
The DFS is headed by the Chief Financial Officer (CFO), who is also the State Fire Marshal and is a member of the Florida Cabinet. The CFO is responsible for the state’s accounting and auditing functions, monitors the investment of state funds, and manages the risk management and deferred compensation programs for the state. The CFO also handles insurance consumer services, oversees insurance fraud investigations, and is responsible for the licensing and supervision of insurance agents, insurance agencies, funeral homes, and cemeteries.

Financial Services Commission (Commission)
The Financial Services Commission (the Commission) was established to protect the public by regulating the insurance, securities, and banking industries in the state of Florida. The Commission includes the Governor, Attorney General, Chief Financial Officer, and Commissioner of Agriculture and is responsible for appointing the officials who oversee the Office of Insurance Regulation (OIR) and the Office of Financial Regulation (OFR). The OIR and the OFR report directly to the Commission.

Office of Insurance Regulation (OIR)
The Office of Insurance Regulation is responsible for all activities that concern insurance companies and risk-bearing entities, including rate-setting, approval of policy forms, market conduct, claim settlement, issuance of certificates of authority, insurer solvency, viatical settlements, premium financing, and administrative supervision. The Commissioner of Insurance (also referred to as the Director of the Office of Insurance Regulation) heads the OIR.

Office of Financial Regulation (OFR)
The Office of Financial Regulation is responsible for all activities of the Financial Services Commission with respect to the regulation of banks, credit unions, other financial institutions, finance companies, and the securities industry. The Commissioner of Financial Regulation (also referred to as the Director of the Office of Financial Regulation) heads the OFR.

2. Licensing Requirements
Appointment
Insurance agents, adjusters, customer service representatives, agencies, and managing general agents must be both licensed and appointed before acting or advertising as an insurance licensee in Florida. In addition, agents and representatives must be licensed before soliciting insurance, which is defined by statute as attempting to persuade an individual or entity to purchase any type of insurance product by

Describing a policy’s terms, premiums, or rates of return (i.e., explaining a policy or its coverages, cost, or interest-bearing features);
Distributing an invitation to contract (i.e., soliciting insurance);
Completing insurance applications or orders;
Comparing insurance products, offering insurance advice, or interpreting insurance coverages or policies; or
Offering or attempting to negotiate a viatical settlement on behalf of another.
When appointed by an insurer, an individual may only hold appointments for lines of insurance for which he or she is licensed. A separate appointment is required for each insurer for whom an individual is appointed as an agent.

Appointments are only valid for the party to whom they are issued and cannot be transferred to another individual or entity. Licensees are not permitted to authorize other individuals or entities to transact insurance using, or under, their appointments.

Contact Information
Individuals
Each insurance license is required to contain specific information, which is requested on the original application for license. A license application requires the applicant’s full name, age, Social Security number, residence and business addresses, mailing address, contact telephone numbers (one of which must be a business telephone number), and a contact email address.

All licensees are required to notify the Department in writing within 30 days of any change in this information. If a licensee’s residence or principal business address is moved to another state, all appointments and licensees will be terminated by the Department immediately.

A fine of $250 applies to any licensee who fails to notify the Department of a change of address or name within the required time frame. Subsequent offenses will result in a fine of at least $500 or suspension or revocation of the license.

Contact information must be updated on the licensee’s MyProfile account on the OIR website; however, changes or updates to a licensee’s name, date of birth, or Social Security number must be submitted in writing to the DFS Bureau of Agent and Agency Licensing at 200 E. Gaines Street, Room 419, Tallahassee, FL 32399-0319.

Businesses and Trade Names
If an individual transacts business under a name other than his or her given name (i.e., under a trade or business name), the agent must notify the Department within 30 days after first transacting insurance using that business name. The notice must be filed on forms approved by the Department that include the business name or names being used, the addresses of any business offices using the business name, and the name and Social Security number of every corporate officer and director or other individual associated with the firm or corporation.

If the name or address associated with any business name is changed, or if the name or address of the business’ personnel, director, or officer changes, the change must be filed with the Department within 30 days of the change. The same requirement applies if any licensee terminates use of, or association with, the firm to which the business name applies or if information contained in the business’s application to the Department changes.

MyProfile
The Department of Financial Services’ Division of Agent and Agency Services requires agents to create an online account in MyProfile, which is the interface between licensees and the Division.

Individuals can perform the following transactions on MyProfile:

Verify a name;
Verify or change an address;
Apply for a Letter of Certification or a Letter of Clearance;
View information and deficiencies on a pending license application;
View licenses and appointments;
Apply for agent and adjuster licenses;
Check CE status; and
Obtain a duplicate license.
Insurance agencies can perform the following transactions on MyProfile:

Verify a name;
Verify an address;
Apply for an agency license; and
Update agency information.
The MyProfile page on the DFS website contains a login page, an education database, and online guides and tutorials. Once an individual has met all licensing requirements, the Department will email its approval for licensure. The individual may then visit his or her MyProfile account to print the license.

All address and contact information MUST be updated and/or verified through the agent’s MyProfile account. However, name, date of birth, and Social Security number changes must be submitted in writing to the Department, with legible supporting documentation (i.e., marriage certificate, articles of incorporation, Social Security card).
MyProfile contains the Education Database, which provides prelicensing and continuing education information, including state requirements. No login is required to access this online information.

Insurance Agency Licensing
In Florida, an insurance agency can be an individual, firm, partnership, corporation, association, or any type of entity so long as it is not an employee of the entity or an adjuster. An insurance agency engages in any activity that, by state law, can only be conducted by a licensed insurance agent; this includes an individual employee who engages in such activity.

Insurance agencies must possess an insurance agency license for every location at which they transact business for which an insurance license is required. An exemption to this requirement exists for agencies that are owned by a single licensed insurance agent doing business in his or her own personal name and who does not employ or subcontract other licensed agents and/or representatives.

If an insurance agency establishes a branch office, the branch office is considered a branch agency and does not need to secure its own license as long as the agency does all of the following:

Transacts business under the same name and federal tax identification number as the licensed agency;
Designates a licensed agent in charge of the branch office, as required by law, with the Department; and
Submits to the Department a request for the branch agency’s address and telephone number to be included in the licensing record of the licensed agency within 30 days after the branch agency begins transacting insurance.
Insurance agencies failing to submit a request for a license as required by law are subject to imposition of an administrative penalty up to $10,000. Beginning October 1, 2015, all insurance agency registrations will be converted to insurance agency licenses automatically.

Applications for an insurance agency license must be submitted in writing (or via MyProfile) and comply with the following requirements: 

Include the signature of at least one of the following individuals, whose names and residence addresses are required to be listed on the application if they direct or participate in the management or control of the agency in any manner: each owner, partner, officer, director, president, senior vice president, secretary, treasurer, and limited liability company member; and
Include the following agency information:
Name, principal business street address, and valid email address;
Name, address, and email address of the agency’s registered agent or other party authorized to accept service on behalf of the agency;
For each branch agency, the name, physical address, telephone number, email address, and the date the branch agency began transacting insurance;
The name of its full-time agent in charge, including the names of any agents in charge of the agency’s branch offices, and applicable location addresses; and
The fingerprints of any sole proprietor, each individual required to be listed in the application, and each individual who directs or participates in the management or control of an incorporated agency that does not trade its shares on a securities exchange.
Once an insurance agency license is issued, it must be displayed prominently in the agency in a location where it is clearly visible to any visiting clients or potential clients.

If an insurance agency requests licensure in a name other than the natural name of an individual, the Department may refuse to issue a license if the true or fictitious name

Is too similar to the name used by another agency or insurer or interferes with another agency or insurer;
Misleads the public in any fashion; or
States or implies the agency is an insurer, motor club, hospital service plan, state or federal agency, charitable organization, or entity whose primary purpose is to provide advice and counsel rather than sell or solicit insurance.
The agent in charge of each insurance agency and its branch agencies must be the licensed and appointed agent responsible for the supervision of all employees of the agency location, regardless of whether the agent in charge actually transacts insurance or meets with the public. The agent in charge must hold an agent’s license for at least two of the lines of insurance being sold or serviced at that branch location. (If only one line of insurance is being sold or serviced, the agent in charge is only required to be licensed in that line of insurance.) The agent in charge is accountable for misconduct and all violations of Insurance Code that may be committed by any agency employee or individual under his or her supervision while acting on behalf of the agency.

Insurance agencies may NOT transact insurance unless they have designated, and are receiving the services of, an agent in charge. Furthermore, all changes to the designation of the agent in charge of any branch location must be reported to the Department within 30 days.
If an agency’s agent in charge terminates his or her affiliation with the agency for any reason, another agent in charge must be designated within 30 days. Such designation must be reported to the Department within that 30-day period. If the agency fails to designate a replacement for the terminated agent in charge for 90 continuous days, the agency license expires automatically on the 91st day after the agent in charge’s termination of affiliation.

Transfer, Surrender, and Termination of License
Insurance licenses and appointments issued in Florida are only valid with respect to the party to whom they are issued; licenses cannot be transferred to any other individual or entity. In addition, licensees are prohibited from permitting any other person to transact insurance under their license.

Transfer
Agents who are licensed in good standing as a resident in another state may transfer their licenses to Florida for the same lines of authority contained on their resident licenses unless the Department finds grounds for refusal. Eligibility criteria for the transfer include:

The individual must become a resident of Florida;
The individual must have been licensed in the other state for at least one year immediately preceding the date of becoming a Florida resident;
The license application must include all requirements and be submitted within 90 days of the individual establishing residency in Florida; requirements include a set of fingerprints and a letter of certification from the applicant’s home state;
Satisfaction of prelicensing education requirements for Florida, unless the applicant’s home state had equivalent prelicensing education requirements; and
Satisfaction of the examination requirements in Florida.
Surrender
All insurance licenses issued in Florida are considered the property of the state and will be invalid and no longer in effect if refused, suspended, revoked, nonrenewed, expired, or otherwise terminated. Licensees are only required to surrender their physical licenses to the Department at the request of the Department.

Termination
Florida insurance licenses can be terminated for any of several reasons, which include refusal, suspension, or revocation. In addition, insurance licenses and appointments are revoked automatically if the licensee is convicted in court of violating Insurance Code or committing a felony. Once a license is revoked automatically for these reasons, the licensee is entitled to an expedited hearing to determine only if the revocation should be reversed because the license was not actually convicted. If a hearing is held, any documents, reports, or other evidence submitted in relation to the license revocation will remain confidential and exempt from being made public until they have been published at the hearing.

If a Florida insurance license is suspended or revoked, the term of the suspension or revocation cannot be longer than two years. During the term of the suspension or revocation, the licensee:

Will also have all appointments suspended/revoked concurrently with the license;
Will not be eligible, or have the right, to apply for any other insurance license;
Cannot receive a license reinstatement without submitting, and receiving approval of, a reinstatement application; and
In the event of a second license suspension or revocation, be required to complete approved continuing education courses before applying for reinstatement.
The license will remain suspended or revoked, along with all appointments and eligibility for licensure, unless the suspension/revocation is rescinded or modified by the Department.

Once an individual’s agent or customer representative license, or eligibility for licensure, has been revoked on two separate occasions, that individual is prohibited from ever being issued any type of Florida insurance license in the future. Similarly, if such an individual has his or her insurance license revoked for any offense related to the sales or solicitation of insurance to a person age 65 or older, the individual can no longer be issued an insurance license in Florida, nor will he or she ever become eligible for an insurance license in Florida. 

During the term of an insurance license’s suspension or revocation, the licensee is not permitted to engage in any activity for which an insurance license or appointment is required. This prohibition includes attempting, or claiming, to engage in such an activity or being employed in any manner by an insurance agent, adjuster, insurance agency, or insurance adjusting firm.

When the term of a suspension or revocation has expired, a new or reinstated license cannot be issued to the licensee if any of the circumstances for which the license was terminated still exist. When requesting the issuance of a new or reinstated license after a suspension or revocation, the licensee is required to submit an application under the same requirements that apply for a first-time applicant for licensure.

If a single license, or eligibility for a license, is suspended or revoked, all other insurance licenses and appointments for that licensee will also be suspended or revoked. If a general lines agent’s license or eligibility for licensure is suspended or revoked, the licenses of any agents who are employed by, or members of, the agent will also be suspended or revoked if they knowingly participated in any act that formed the basis of the suspension or revocation of the general lines agent’s license. If an insurance agency’s license is suspended or revoked, the license of any licensee under the management, ownership, control, or directorship of any licensee that participated in activities that caused the original agency’s license suspension/revocation) may also be suspended or revoked.

Grounds for Refusal, Suspension, or Revocation of Insurance Licenses and Appointments
Insurance licensees are required to behave in a professional, ethical, legal fashion at all times, and especially when transacting insurance. Failure to comply with laws and/or the state’s code of ethics may result in a licensee, or a license applicant, experiencing a license refusal, suspension, or revocation.

Certain conduct results in automatic, or compulsory, license termination or loss of eligibility for licensure and appointment. Other conduct constitutes grounds for discretionary termination. The standards for licensure of agents, customer representatives, adjusters, service representatives, managing general agents are the same; however, other standards apply to insurance agencies.

Grounds for Compulsory License Refusal, Suspension, or Revocation
Applicants, Agents, Customer Representatives, Service Representatives, MGAs
If the following conditions exist, the license and appointment of an applicant, agent, customer representative, service representative, or managing general agent MUST be refused, suspended, or revoked and the eligibility for licensure of any such applicant will be rescinded:

Obtaining, having, or using a license/appointment to solicit or handle controlled business;
Material misstatement, misrepresentation, or fraud in applying for the license/appointment;
Lack of qualifications, as required by Insurance Code;
Proven lack of fitness or trustworthiness to engage in the business of insurance;
Failure to pass the required license exam;
Unlawful rebating;
Fraudulent or dishonest practices when conducting business under the license/appointment issued;
Proven lack of knowledge or technical competence to transact insurance in the lines licensed/appointed;
Having been found guilty of, or pleading guilty or nolo contendere (no contest) to, a felony in any jurisdiction that involves moral turpitude and that requires punishment by imprisonment of one or more years;
Fraud or dishonesty in submitting, or assisting with the submission of, a workers’ compensation claim that contains false or misleading information about employee payroll or rate class to avoid paying the appropriate premium;
Theft, embezzlement, or misuse of funds belonging to insurers, beneficiaries, or others received when transacting business under the license/appointment;
Willful misrepresentation of, or deception pertaining to, any insurance policy to settle a claim on less favorable terms than those stated in the policy;
Violating specific conditions with respect to the settlement of viatical contracts;
Deliberate failure to comply with any order of the Department or provision of Insurance Code;
Use of the license/appointment to willfully avoid compliance with Insurance Code; and
Sale of an unregistered security that was required to be registered.
If the Department receives word that a licensee has been indicted for any of the following felonies, the license and all related appointments will be immediately suspended on a temporary basis. If the licensee is found guilty or pleads nolo contendere (no contest) to the crime during an appeal, the suspension will continue, regardless of whether convicted or a judgment is entered.

Once convicted or pleading guilty to any of the following felonies, the individual is permanently barred from applying for, or holding, an insurance license in Florida:

First degree felony;
Capital felony;
Felony involving money laundering, fraud, or embezzlement; or
Felony directly related to any activity regulated by the DFS, OIR, or OFR.
Insurance Agencies
If the following conditions exist, the license of any insurance agency will be refused, suspended, or revoked if the agency or any majority owner, partner, manager, director, officer, or other person who manages or controls the agency:

Lack of the agency of one or more qualifications for licensure;
Material misstatement, misrepresentation, or fraud in applying for the license; and
Denial, suspension, or revocation of a license to practice or conduct any regulated profession, business, or vocation related to the business of insurance in any jurisdiction of the United States.
Grounds for Discretionary Refusal, Suspension, or Revocation
Applicants, Agents, Customer Representatives, Service Representatives, MGAs
If a licensee engages in behavior that does not call for mandatory termination of a license and appointment, the Department may still deny, suspend, or revoke a license, appointment, or eligibility of a license if the Department finds that certain circumstances exist:

A condition exists and, if it had been known at the time the license/appointment was issued, the license/appointment would have been refused;
Having been found guilty of, or pleading guilty or nolo contendere (no contest) to, a felony or a crime in any jurisdiction that requires punishment by imprisonment of one or more years;
Violation of a rule or order of the Department;
Failure or refusal to pay funds due to an insurer the licensee represents;
Violation of Insurance Code, or other law pertinent to the business of insurance, took place in the course of transacting business under the license/appointment;
Engaging in unfair or deceptive acts or practices, as defined in Insurance Code, when conducting the business of insurance;
Deliberately over-insuring any property or health insurance risk;
Violation of laws prohibiting twisting;
Cheating on a license exam;
Failure to inform the Department within 30 days after being convicted of, or pleading guilty or nolo contendere to a felony or crime that requires punishment by imprisonment of one or more years;
Has been the subject of, or has had, a violation of any of the following with respect to the securities or commodities industries: administrative or regulatory decision, finding, injunction, suspension, prohibition, revocation, denial, judgment, action, or order in any jurisdiction;
Knowingly assisting another to violate any provision of Insurance Code or any order or rule of the DFS, OIR, or the Commission; or
Failure to comply with any child enforcement program.
Insurance Agencies
If an insurance agency or any majority owner, partner, manager, director, officer, or other person who manages or controls the agency engages in behavior that does not call for mandatory termination of a license and appointment, the Department may still deny, suspend, or revoke a license, appointment, or eligibility for a license if it finds that certain circumstances exist:

A condition exists and, if it had been known at the time the license/appointment was issued, the license/appointment would have been refused;
Having been found guilty of, or having pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony in any state relating to the business of insurance, regardless of whether a judgment or conviction was entered;
Knowingly employing a manager or employee who deals with the public when that person’s insurance license was suspended or revoked by the Department;
Failure to take corrective action or report a violation to the Department within 30 days after the violation is known or should have been known;
Using the agency license to avoid requirements of Insurance Code; or
Committing any of the following acts with such frequency the agency operations are hazardous to the public or other persons:
Theft, embezzlement, or misuse of funds belonging to insurers, beneficiaries, or others received when transacting business under the license/appointment;
Unlawful rebating;
Misrepresentation of, or deception pertaining to, any insurance policy
Violation of any provision of Insurance Code or other law pertaining to the business of insurance;
Violation of any order or rule of the Department;
Failure or refusal to pay funds due to an insurer the licensee represents;
Engaging in unfair or deceptive acts or practices, as defined in Insurance Code, when conducting the business of insurance;
Fraudulent or dishonest practices when conducting insurance agency activities; or
Demonstrating a lack of fitness or trustworthiness to engage in the business of insurance when conducting insurance agency activities.
Duties of Licensed vs. Unlicensed Personnel
Because most insurance transactions require the insurance professional engaging in them to be licensed, it is essential for all insurance professionals to understand precisely what activities and duties require an insurance license. Similarly, it is essential for everyone to understand the boundaries separating requirements of licensed and unlicensed personnel. The Insurance Code and Administrative Rules in Florida specify clearly what conduct is permitted by law.

Clerical employees are not considered agents or customer representatives if

They are employed by an insurance agent or agency, are paid a salary, and work full-time as a clerical employee;
The taking of insurance applications, quoting insurance, and receiving premium payments from those visiting the office is incidental to their full-time clerical duties; and
Their compensation is not tied in any way to the production of insurance applications, policies, and premiums nor does it include any commissions on business handled.
Clerical employees who are not licensed cannot

Bind insurance coverage;
Initiate contact with anyone for the purpose of soliciting insurance; or
Receive any fee or other consideration for referring prospective clients to an insurance agent if the referral is contingent in any manner upon the purchase of insurance.
Compliance
In order to be sure unlicensed personnel are not engaging in any prohibited activity, it is essential for all personnel to understand Chapter 69B-222 of Florida Administrative Code, which contains the rules and definitions pertaining to unlicensed insurance personnel.

Definitions
Incidental means activity that meets ALL of the following criteria:

All “incidental” work in terms of the amount of time the employee spends performing it is no more than 10% of the employee’s time when compared to time spent performing tasks that are not “incidental” work;
The exact amount and timing of the “incidental” work is not foreseeable; and
In terms of all work performed by all employees at the agency, the total “incidental” work performed by unlicensed personnel is no more than 10% of the total time the agency’s agents, solicitors, and customer representatives, in that office, spend performing tasks that are not “incidental” work.
If a dispute arises pertaining to whether an unlicensed employee’s work is “incidental,” as long as no evidence of abuse exists, the Department will review the agency’s operations during a 6- to 12-month period.

Example:

An employee is charged with performing prohibited activity because she spent one entire 40-hour week taking applications and giving quotes. The Department will review the employee’s activity for the 6- to 12-month period prior to the week in question.

If the employee typically spent 30 minutes per week on taking applications and quotes, and only spent the week in question doing so full-time because one of the agency’s two agents was away on vacation, the work performed during the week in question WOULD be considered “incidental.”

It is important to recognize that if the employee had performed prohibited work (in other words, selling insurance), that work would still be in violation.

Giving a quote is the simple process of collecting basic underwriting information from a party asking for a quote and referring to written underwriting guidelines that state a specific rate. When an unlicensed employee gives a quote, the employee CANNOT

Use his or her own judgment;
Give insurance advice;
Interpret policy language or provisions;
Explain any underwriting or insurance procedures;
Process insurance paperwork;
Bind insurance; or
Sign an application.
Taking an application is the process of completing a blank application form with information provided by the applicant and forwarding the application to an agent or customer representative for review and processing, the binding of insurance, policy interpretation, insurance advice, and/or explanation. When an unlicensed employee takes an application, the employee CANNOT

Use his or her own judgment;
Give insurance advice;
Interpret policy language or provisions;
Explain any underwriting or insurance procedures;
Process insurance paperwork;
Bind insurance; or
Sign an application.
Unlicensed Personnel
Lawful Activities
Unlicensed employees may perform any of the following duties at any time:

Act as switchboard operator, receptionist, secretary, but only when the sole duties involve receiving incoming calls and visitors and either taking messages or directing the calls and visitors to licensed employees;
Explain claims procedures and provide claim status, but only if doing so simply requires the unlicensed individual to read information from agency files and records; unlicensed personal CANNOT their own judgment or make any interpretations based on the records or files; and
When directed to do so by a licensed agent, solicitor, or customer representative,
Call an individual and schedule a sales/solicitation appointment for that licensed employee; or
Convey specific information as a statement made by the agent (i.e., "Agent Brown wants me to tell you the cost of your policy change is $50").
Lawful "Incidental" Activities
Unlicensed employees may perform the following duties, but only if they are performed as “incidental” to their primary duties:

Give a quote in the agent's office to those visiting the office and asking for a quote;
Take an application for insurance in the agent's office for those who have called or visited the office; or
Take an insurance premium in the agent's office. This does not include the handling of premium payments received by mailroom employees or other unlicensed employees who handle mail.
Unlicensed employees may perform these duties by telephone, but only if they are physically in the agent's office.

Unlawful Activities
Unlicensed personnel may NEVER perform the following activities:

Compare insurance products, provide advice about insurance matters or needs, or interpret insurance coverage or policies;
Bind insurance, including
For new or existing clients;
On a new, renewal, or replacement basis; or
Adding additional coverage or property to existing policies; or
Soliciting the sale of insurance in any manner, including in person or by telephone; this prohibition does not include making telephone appointments at the specific request of a specific licensed agent with a specific individual.
Penalties
If an unlicensed individual or entity violates Insurance Code by transacting insurance or engaging in insurance activities without a license, the violation is considered a third degree felony punishable by:

Imprisonment up to 5 years;
A fine up to $5,000; or
If the offender is deemed a habitual felony offender, imprisonment up to 10 years.
3. Other Requirements: Advertising
In Florida, insurers must receive approval by the Department before distributing it. When using approved advertising material, agents must use it EXACTLY as approved by the insurer because altering it may render the advertising noncompliant with the Department.

Example:

Regulators investigated an insurance agency concerning one of its advertisements. The agency had altered an insurer-approved ad and the changes violated the Insurance Code.

All insurance advertising materials and communications distributed in Florida must communicate clearly that they pertain to insurance products.

Florida law considers certain types of advertising as Unfair Methods of Competition and Unfair or Deceptive Acts. Prohibited acts and practices related to advertising include misrepresenting and falsely advertising insurance policies, which is deliberately using, issuing, or distributing an estimate, illustration, statement, sales presentation, comparison, or omission that

Misrepresents an insurance policy’s benefits, advantages, conditions, or terms;
Misrepresents an insurance policy’s dividends or share or surplus to be issued;
Makes a false or misleading statement about the dividends or shares of surplus already paid on a policy;
Uses the name or title of an insurance policy, or a class of insurance, to misrepresent the true nature of the policy;
Is purposely misleading and intended to cause another policy’s lapse, forfeit, exchange, conversion, or surrender;
Misrepresents the policy as being shares of stock or insurance company ownership interest; or 
Would mislead or cause a reasonable person to believe in error that the federal government, or a state government, backs the insurance policy or is a source of claim payment made by the policy.
False information and advertising, generally means deliberately making, publishing, distributing, or issuing to the public an advertisement, statement, or announcement that contains an untrue, deceptive, or misleading statement that pertains to the business of insurance:

In a newspaper, magazine, or other written publication;
Misrepresents an insurance policy’s dividends or share or surplus to be issued;
Over a television or radio station;
In a letter, notice, circular, pamphlet, or poster; or
In any other way.
Example:

The agent purchases an ad in the local Chamber of Commerce newsletter to generate interest of fellow Chamber members in commercial lines insurance. The agent alters the approved advertising piece provided by the insurer to make it more appealing; unfortunately, the ad contains a typographical error that illustrates the policy premium as costing far less than it is advertised to cost.

Defamation is deliberately making, publishing, distributing, or issuing a verbal or written statement that is maliciously critical of, or offensive to, any individual or entity with the purpose of causing harm or injury.

Example:

The agent harbored a grudge against a former employer, the owner of an insurance agency, for firing him. During a business networking event, the agent was overheard by several people to state that his former employer had cheated on his business tax returns for years and was being investigated by the Internal Revenue Service.

Because a number of individuals believed the agent’s statement, they cancelled their insurance with the former employer and placed their business with the agent.

Prohibited advertising gifts is giving to an insured, prospective insured, or other party an advertising gift of merchandise valued at more than $25.

Example:

One general lines insurance agent made a practice of giving coffee mugs imprinted with his name and that of his insurance agency as a gift to clients who purchased any property and casualty insurance policy. The cost of the mugs was $12 each, so this practice is not prohibited.

Free insurance is advertising “free insurance” as an incentive to buy any type of property or related services. “Free insurance” is insurance for which no identifiable or additional charge is made to the buyer of property or services or for which the identifiable or additional charge is less than the cost of insurance would be.

This prohibition does not apply to blanket disability insurance, credit life or disability insurance, or travel insurance.

Example:

Investigators learned an insurance agent’s sign was advertising “free insurance” if a client earned less than $45,000 per year. This practice is prohibited.

Florida Advertising Requirements
The state of Florida requires insurance advertisements to contain clear and unambiguous statements when advertising life insurance and annuity contracts.

The Florida Administrative Rules also require life insurance and annuity advertisements to provide clear, truthful, and adequate disclosure concerning the benefits they provide and the limitations and exclusions contained in the policies to which they refer.

Definitions
Florida law refers to several types of advertisements, specifically:

Institutional advertisement;
Invitation to inquire; and 
Invitation to contract.
The sole purpose of an institutional advertisement is to promote interest in a particular insurance company that sells life insurance and annuity contracts or in the concept of life insurance and annuity contracts. Institutional advertisements do not discuss policy terms and conditions, pricing, or particulars.

The purpose of an invitation to inquire is to encourage requests for information about life insurance and annuities. This type of advertisement is restricted to contain specific information and disclosures:

The description of coverage must be brief and can only include
A brief description of the types of loss for which coverage is provided;
The dollar amount of benefits payable; and 
The period of time during which benefits are payable;
The advertisement must contain a provision that says, essentially: "This policy has exclusions, limitations, reductions in benefits, and/or terms under which the policy may be continued or discontinued. For costs and complete details of coverage, call or write your insurance agent/insurance company;" and
The advertisement CANNOT
Use any ploy that creates unwarranted concern;
Exaggerate the policy’s benefits;
Contain premium cost; or
Violate any provision of Insurance Code.
Note: If an invitation to inquire does contain a premium cost but, otherwise, meets all requirements of an invitation to inquire, it will be considered an “invitation to contract.”

The purpose of an invitation to contract is any type of advertisement that does not meet the definitions of “institutional advertisement” or “invitation to inquire.” An invitation to contract includes agent training and education materials received by a prospective policyholder even if intended for “agent use only.”

Advertising Policy Proceeds, Premiums, and Features
Advertising in Florida cannot contain any deceptive words, phrases, or illustrations and, specifically, cannot use terms that have the ability or tendency to mislead or deceive consumers about a policy’s benefits, features, proceeds, or premiums. Invitations to contract must contain the following information:

The insurer’s name;
The agent’s name;
The policy form number;
The type of plan;
The premium amount and payment period; and
If applicable, any changes to face amounts or premiums.
An invitation to contract must disclose the following:

Any limitations that affect the policy’s basic provisions; and
Provisions applicable to the policy’s renewal, cancellation, termination, modification of benefits, losses covered, and premiums associated with age or other conditions in a manner that does not make light of them.
If an advertisement invites consumers to join an association or discretionary group, it must use a separate and distinct application form that requires separate signatures for each application, meaning the application for insurance must be a different form than the application for membership in the association or group.

If an advertisement contains a testimonial, the third-party endorsement must be genuine, represent the endorser’s opinion, apply to the policy being advertised, and be reproduced accurately. When an insurer uses such a testimonial, it is considered the insurer’s own words and opinion.

If a testimonial or endorsement is used more than a year after it was originally provided by the author, the insurer must obtain a confirmation from the author.

Testimonials and endorsements are deemed made by a spokesperson if the author:

Has a financial interest in the insurer;
Is an entity of the insurer or is owned or controlled by the insurer or its employees;
Is in a policy-making position of an insurer affiliate serving as a stockholder, director, officer, or employee; or
Is compensated, in any fashion, for making the testimonial or endorsement.
A spokesperson is considered to be soliciting insurance, and needs an insurance license, if the person performs any of the following activities:

Solicits insurance or takes insurance applications;
Engages in the business of analyzing insurance policies;
Acts as an insurance consultant; or
Performs an invitation to contract, except when performed by a company officer as permitted by law.
If an advertisement contains a spokesperson’s testimonial or endorsement, the ad must disclose the spokesperson’s financial interest in a prominent fashion, along with the fact (if applicable) that the person was compensated for making the statement.

4. Other Requirements: Recordkeeping
All agents, agencies, and customer representatives licensed in Florida are required by law to receive funds in a fiduciary capacity. This includes premiums paid, return premiums, and all other money that belongs to insurers or is received by the licensee under the license.

Funds are considered trust funds and, if received on behalf of an insurer for which the licensee is required to place them into a separate trust account. The trust account must be available for inspection and audit by the Department.

All books, accounts, and records related to the payment of insurance premiums must be kept and maintained for 3 years after a payment transaction. These books, accounts, and records may be maintained in paper, by computer, or by photocopies. The only exception to this record retention requirement is for binders issued when no policy was subsequently issued and no premium was ever collected.

Any licensee that diverts or misappropriates funds held in trust as outlined above, or deprives another party of a benefit related to those funds, commits an offense as follows:

Type of Offense	Type of Offense	Penalty
Mishandled funds up to $300	First degree misdemeanor	Imprisonment up to 1 year and/or a fine up to $1,000
Mishandled funds from $301 to $19,999	Third degree felony	Imprisonment up to 5 years and/or a fine up to $5,000
Mishandled funds from $20,000 to $99,999	
Second degree felony

Imprisonment up to 15 years and/or a fine up to $10,000
Mishandled funds from $100,000 and more	 First degree felony	Imprisonment up to 30 years and/or a fine up to $10,000
The penalties and fines for habitual felony offenders are higher than those shown above are. A habitual felony offender is a defendant who was previously convicted of any combination of two or more felonies in the state of Florida, who committed the current felony while serving a prison sentence or court-ordered supervision for a prior felony conviction, or who committed the current felony with 5 years of a prior conviction, release from prison, probation, parole, or court-ordered supervision related to a prior felony conviction.

All licensed agents must maintain records related to all insurance policies for which they transact insurance. Records must be kept in the insurance agent’s office or be readily accessible by electronic or photographic means for at least 5 years after a policy expires. These policy records include daily reports, application forms, change endorsements, and any documents signed or initialed by the insured.

5. Department Communication
The Florida Department of Financial Services works in conjunction with the Office of Insurance Regulation and the Office of Financial Regulation. Licensees are required to communicate with the Department and both Offices under specific conditions contained in Florida law. In addition, consumers and others contact these regulatory bodies on a recurring basis.

The Department mail address is 200 East Gaines Street, Tallahassee, FL 32399. Office hours between 8 a.m. and 5 p.m. Eastern Standard Time, Monday through Friday. The Department’s toll-free number is 1-877-693-5236 and the number for those calling from out of state is 1-850-413-3089. Those wishing to contact the Department online may do so by sending a message via the Contact page on the DFS website at http://www.myfloridacfo.com/askFLDFS/

The mail address of the Office of Insurance Regulation is the same as that for the DFS; however, its phone numbers are different. To obtain the various phone numbers of the divisions within the OIR, visit the Contact page on the OIR website at http://www.floir.com/Office/ContactUs.aspx

The mail address of the Office of Financial Regulation is same as that for the DFS and the OIR; however, its phone number is 1-850-587-9687.

Other statewide offices of the OFR are located in Miami, Orlando, West Palm Beach, and Tampa. The Online Services page on the OFR’s website can be found at http://www.flofr.com/StaticPages/WelcomeToOnlineServices.htm

The following resources have been provided to help agents and their clients submit communication to other divisions and departments of the DFS:

Department of Financial Services	www.myfloridacfo.com/SAFE/
DFS Insurance Agent and Agency Services	www.myfloridacfo.com/Division/Agents/
MyProfile (online portal for the Financial Services’ Bureau of Licensing)	https://dice.fldfs.com/PUBLIC/PB_INDEX.ASPX
eAppoint (DFS Electronic Appointment System)	https://iportal.fldfs.com/EAPPOINT/
Insurance Insights (DFS newsletter)	www.myfloridacfo.com/Division/Agents/Newsletter/
Transparency Florida (an open door to Florida’s finances)	www.myfloridacfo.com/Transparency/
Financial Frontlines/Your Money Matters	www.myfloridacfo.com/Division/Agents/Newsletter/
On Guard for Seniors	www.myfloridacfo.com/OnGuard/#.VgLGF2yFPDc
Operation S.A.F.E. (Stop Adult Financial Exploitation)	www.myfloridacfo.com/SAFE/
Consumer Helpline	https://apps.fldfs.com/ESERVICE/Default.aspx
Office of Insurance Regulation	www.floir.com/
Office of Financial Regulation	www.flofr.com/
6. Florida Insurance Guaranty Association (FIGA)
The Florida Insurance Guaranty Association (FIGA) is part of a national system composed of nonprofit organizations in each state that are designed to pay specific outstanding claims of insolvent property and casualty insurers. All property and casualty insurers licensed to do business in the state of Florida must become members of FIGA and the purpose of this financial mechanism is to protect Florida policyholders and claimants from financial loss.

The Florida Insurance Guaranty Association applies to all types of direct insurance EXCEPT

Life, annuity, health, and disability insurance;
Bonding obligations, including fidelity and surety bonds;
Mortgage guaranty, financial guaranty, and other types of insurance against investment risk;
Credit insurance, vendor’s single interest (VSI) insurance, and collateral protection insurance;
Warranty service protection;
Legal expense;
Ambulance, health care, and funeral service;
Optometric, dental, and pharmaceutical service plans;
Health maintenance, prepaid health clinic, and continuing care;
Self-insurance, including any type of self-insurance fund or pool;
Ocean and wet marine insurance;
Title insurance;
Surplus lines insurance;
Insurance provided or guaranteed by the government;
Workers compensation and employers liability insurance; or
Transfer of any credit or investment risk without the transfer of insurance risk.
A member insurer is any person or entity that is licensed to transact insurance in Florida and writes any kind of insurance not exempt under law (and as shown above), including reciprocal and interinsurance contracts. An insolvent insurer is a member insurer that was authorized to transact insurance in Florida at the time the policy was written or at the time an insured event occurred, and against whom and order of liquidation with a finding of insolvency was entered by the Court under a final order.

As a condition of obtaining a certificate of authority to transact insurance in Florida, all property and casualty insurers must become members of FIGA. In addition, all member insurers must agree to reimburse FIGA for all claim payments made on their behalf if they become insolvent and are subsequently rehabilitated.

The Association is obligated to pay covered claims that exist before any of the following events:

An insurer is declared insolvent and within 30 days after it is declared insolvent;
A policy’s expiration date, if it is fewer than 30 days after the date the insurer is declared insolvent; or
The insured cancels or replaces the policy, if such action is taken within 30 days of the date the insurer is declared insolvent.
FIGA pays covered claims up to the following amounts:

Type of Benefit	Coverage Limit
All policies, after the first $100 of a covered claim
$300,000
Coverage that only applies to the damaged structure and contents insured under a homeowners policy	An additional $200,000
State law prevents policyholders from recovering under FIGA and another policy for the same loss. If a covered claim is insured by FIGA, and also by an insurer that is not insolvent, any claims paid under FIGA will be reduced by any amounts paid by the other insurer. Similarly, if a policyholder is insured by FIGA and another state’s guarantee association, the primary insurance is the association of the state in which the insured’s residence is located. However, the following exceptions exist:

Under a first party claim for damage to property with a permanent location, the association in the state in which the property is located is primary; and
Under a workers’ compensation policy, the association in the state of residence of the injured employee is primary.
If an advertisement or solicitation of insurance refers to FIGA as part of the sales process, it must also spell out the coverage limits provided by the Association.

Insurance Laws and Updates
1. Federal Law Updates
Department of Labor Fiduciary Rule
Qualified retirement plans, such as 401(k) plans, IRAs, are critical to the retirement security of many U.S. workers. Investment professionals play an important role in guiding these investment decisions. However, the ways that financial advisers are compensated sometimes create conflicts of interest, which can bias the investment advice they give and impact customer investment results. The Department of Labor has proposed a new rule that attaches fiduciary status to more of the advice rendered to plan officials, participants, and beneficiaries.

The Department of Labor's (DOL) Conflict of Interest Rule, also known as the fiduciary rule, would change how a financial professional becomes a fiduciary under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act (ERISA), and establishes a new set of standards for everyone doing business in the qualified marketplace. The rule would require additional disclosures, documentation, supervision and a host of new rules and regulations.

Under the new rule, insurance-only agents who want to receive compensation on new business may need to work with a financial institution, which will vouch that the agent is working in the client's best interest. Financial institutions include:

Broker/dealers registered with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC);
Banks;
Insurance companies;
Registered investment advisers (RIAs).
Independent, life insurance only agents who work within the qualified marketplace may decide to become registered representatives or investment advisor representatives, may become full fiduciaries by registering with the SEC, or may abandon the qualified market altogether.

The status of this new rule has been somewhat in limbo since the 2016 election. The new Administration has delayed implementation and may cancel it altogether. Still, many financial institutions have already adopted these fiduciary best practices.

National Flood Insurance Program
Floods are generally caused by a variety of weather events; therefore, virtually all property is exposed to the risk of being inundated by floodwaters. Because insurable perils must be accidental in nature, and not likely or certain to occur, standard property insurers have traditionally excluded the peril of flood from coverage provided by their policies. In the current marketplace, virtually every property policy excludes the peril of flood.

Over time, the combination of an historical increase in the occurrence of damaging floods and the lack of available insurance placed a tremendous financial burden on the U.S. government and its citizens and businesses, all of whom shouldered the cost of uninsured flood damage after catastrophic events in this country.

Attempts were made to reduce the potential for flood-induced property damage by constructing dams, levees, and other structures to divert floodwaters from buildings, farmlands, and communities.

However, when a rise in the number of natural disasters occurred during the 1950s and 1960s, the U.S. government decided additional measures were required to supplement the structural controls upon which the country relied.

FLOOD FACTS

The number one natural disaster in the United States is flooding.
Over the term of a 30-year mortgage, property located in a high-risk flood area is more apt to sustain flood damage than it is to sustain fire damage.
More than 20% of all NFIP flood insurance claims are for property that is NOT located in a high-risk flood zone (i.e., it is located in moderate- or low-risk areas).
The average flood insurance premium is approximately $700 per year; the average flood insurance claim during the past 5 years was almost $42,000.
Between 2008 and 2012, the average NFIP commercial flood insurance claim exceeded $87,000.
Between 2010 and 2014, the average of all NFIP flood insurance claims was almost $42,000.
Between 2005 and 2014 the total amount paid for NFIP flood insurance claims exceeded $3.5 billion, per year.
In calendar year 2014, NFIP flood insurance policies paid more than $345 million in claims to policyholders.
The state of Florida received the highest amount of NFIP claim payments among the states (2,655 claims for total payments of $117,861,100).
Source: Federal Emergency Management Agency, 2015
National Flood Insurance Program
When the National Flood Insurance Act (NFIA) was passed by Congress in 1968, the National Flood Insurance Program was created to establish a nationwide floodplain management mechanism that would accomplish two goals:

Reduce property damage caused by floods; and
Reduce government and public spending in the form of disaster assistance.
Flood insurance was made available to the public for the first time, and over the years, the NFIA was amended by subsequent federal legislations:

The Flood Insurance Protection Act of 1973 and Flood Disaster Protection Act of 1973 required lenders of federally backed loans and mortgages to require the issuance of flood insurance on property secured by those loans if it is located in a high-risk flood area (Special Flood Hazard Area, or SFHA).

The National Flood Insurance Reform Act of 1984 increased the focus on compliance by lenders and created a mitigation assistance program to reduce the costs of flood damage.

The Flood Insurance Reform Act of 2004 (FIRA) established minimum flood insurance training and education requirements for insurance agents and created other NFIP reforms pertaining to repetitive loss properties and consumer awareness.

The Biggert-Waters Flood Insurance Reform Act of 2012 funded and implemented a national remapping program along with certain rate increases to strengthen the fiscal soundness of the NFIP. These rate increases were designed to eliminate discounted flood insurance rates and require NFIP policies to charge the full actuarial rates of flood risk.

The Consolidated Appropriations Act of 2014 prevented certain provisions of Biggert-Waters from being implemented (i.e., elimination of subsidized rates and grandfathering provisions) while Congress negotiated the drafting of new flood insurance laws.

The Homeowner Flood Insurance Affordability Act of 2014 was the result of Congressional and public disappointment with Biggert-Waters and the Consolidated Appropriations Act. It repealed certain sections of Biggert-Waters, restored the NFIP’s grandfathering provisions, established limits on certain rate increases, and applied an annual policy surcharge on all policies to address commitment to the NFIP’s continued fiscal soundness.

The NFIP is administered by the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), which is an agency of the U.S. Department of Homeland Security, and works with nearly 80 private insurance companies in its Write Your Own (WYO) Program. WYO carriers work in cooperation with the federal government to write and service the NFIP’s Standard Flood Insurance Policy (SFIP) in their own names. The carriers must comply with the NFIP’s rules and regulations in exchange for receiving an expense allowance for policies written and claims processed.

The WYO Program has 3 main goals:

Increase the number and geographic distribution of NFIP policies;
Improve service to NFIP policyholders; and
Provide the insurance industry with direct flood insurance operating experience.
The NFIP is scheduled to continue through September 2017; however, reauthorization of the Program has involved some challenges in the past.

Since 2008, the NFIP was reauthorized by public law 18 times; at four of those times, the Program actually lapsed and no flood insurance was permitted to be issued or renewed during the terms of the lapses. Although three of the lapses only lasted for 1 day, the NFIP was actually suspended for 2 months during 2010, from May 31 through June 1.

Because the financial condition of the NFIP had been tenuous for some time, when Congress enacted Biggert-Waters, it eliminated the NFIP’s Grandfather Rule for most policies issued with subsidized rates as a means to help strengthen its fiscal condition. Biggert-Waters called for policyholders to pay the “full-risk rate” for flood insurance and capped annual premium rate increases at 25% until the full-risk rate was achieved. (Note: the full-risk rate is the actuarial charge for insurance, without subsidies, based on the property’s actual flood risk.)

A great many politicians and consumers created public outcry, denouncing Biggert-Waters’ premium increases, along with several other of its provisions. As a result, Congress enacted the HFIAA to

Lower some of Biggert-Waters’ rate increases;
Prevent some of Biggert-Waters’ future rate increases;
Implement a surcharge (beginning in 2015) that applies to all flood policies; and
Repeal certain Biggert-Waters rate increases that were already implemented, providing for refunds to those policyholders affected.
Grandfathering Rule
The NFIP’s Grandfathering Rule allows certain property owners to obtain flood insurance at subsidized rates under specific circumstances after a flood insurance rate map (FIRM) has been revised or republished. Grandfathering applies when the property is remapped into a higher flood zone.

Before enactment of Biggert-Waters and HFIAA, any type of property was eligible for grandfathering if

The policyholder had maintained continuous coverage under the NFIP flood insurance policy; or
The building was constructed in accordance with the flood insurance rate map at the time of construction.
FEMA began updating this country’s flood insurance rate maps (FIRMs) in 2008. Earlier versions of FIRMs were at least 10 years old and did not reflect the latest data-gathering and mapping technology. Sometimes, after a new FIRM is issued, some property owners find that their property has been remapped into a different flood hazard zone. If the new flood zone is lower than the original zone, it generates a lower premium and property owners tend to be happy.

Unfortunately, if property is remapped into a higher zone, especially into a high-risk flood zone from a low- or moderate-risk zone, property owners are not happy when they experience a rate increase.

In other circumstances, remapping results in

The base flood elevation increasing for certain pieces of property, which also generates a premium increase; and
A federal mandate for a property owner to purchase flood insurance, if the new flood zone is in a SFHA and the property was secured by a federally regulated or insurance mortgage or loan.
A high-risk flood zone is referred to as Special Flood Hazard Area (SFHA); property located in a SFHA has a 25 percent chance of experiencing a base flood during the term of a 30-year mortgage. If property located in a SFHA was purchased in connection with a mortgage or loan provided by a federally regulated or insured lender, FEMA requires the property owner to purchase flood insurance.

The base flood elevation is the elevation shown on a FIRM for SFHAs; it indicates the water surface elevation resulting from a base flood, which is a flood that has a 1% change of equaling or exceeding that level in any given year. A base flood is the standard used by the NFIP, FEMA, and all federal agencies.

It is important for agents to understand that property owners with property remapped into a SFHA only have one opportunity to take advantage of the Grandfather Rule.
Currently, grandfathering is ONLY available for buildings that are the primary residences of their owners and

The property owner had already purchased a NFIP flood insurance policy when the new flood insurance rate map became effective; or
The building was constructed in compliance with the FIRM in effect at the time of construction.
Buildings that have been substantially damaged or improved are NOT eligible for grandfathering.
Refunds
Because certain provisions of Biggert-Waters were repealed by the HFIAA, some flood insurance policyholders paid increased premium rates that are no longer legal. The NFIP and the WYO insurers are required to provide refunds to these policyholders.

The following charge provides details of policies eligible for refunds:

New Policies for Pre-FIRM Buildings
Requirements:

Must be in flood zones A, D, or V;
Building must have been constructed before the effective date of the first FIRM;
Building cannot have been substantially damaged or improved; and
Policy effective date is on or after 10/01/2013.
If eligible, the policyholder MAY receive a one-time refund that will equal the difference between the full-risk rate paid and the subsidized rate that went into effect on 10/01/2013.

Only about 1% of all NFIP policies are eligible for this refund.

Pre-FIRM Buildings: Policies Reinstated after Lapse
Requirements:

Must be in flood zones A, D, or V;
Building must have been constructed before the effective date of the first FIRM;
Building cannot have been substantially damaged or improved; and
Policy effective date is on or after 10/04/2012.
If eligible, the policyholder MAY receive a one-time refund that will equal the difference between the full-risk rate paid and the subsidized rate that went into effect on 10/01/2013.

Future subsidized rates will ONLY apply if the reinstatement occurs after coverage was dropped because the lender no longer required coverage.

Pre-FIRM Buildings: 25% Rate Increase for Nonresidential Buildings
Requirements:

Must be in flood zones A, D, or V; and
Policyholder received a 25% increase at renewal on or after 10/01/2013.
If eligible, the policyholder MAY receive a one-time refund if the premium increase was more than 18%.

Rate Increases of More than 18% for Other Residential and Nonresidential Buildings
If the policy rate increased more than 18% at renewal on or after 10/01/2013 and the building does not fall into an exception category (see below).

If eligible, the policyholder MAY receive a one-time refund of the difference between the higher rate paid and the maximum 18% cap.

Only about 13% of all NFIP policies are eligible for this refund

Policies with premium increases that are NOT eligible for refunds include the following:

Policy was in effect before 07/06/2012 and building is a Pre-FIRM non-primary residence;
Premium increases will continue at 25% until the full-risk rate is achieved;
Policy was in effect before 07/06/2012 and the building is a severe repetitive loss property;
Premium increases will continue at 25% until the full-risk rate is achieved;
Premium increase was the result of a reduction in the deductible or an increase in the limit or type of coverage; or
Not eligible for any type of refund.
All refunds will be mailed to the policyholder and only apply to increases in premiums.
HFIAA - April 2015 Program Changes
In April 2015, implementation of the HFIAA began taking place for both new business flood insurance policies and renewal flood insurance policies issued by the NFIP and insurers participating in its Write Your Own Program.

Premium Increases and Surcharges
Beginning in April 2015, average annual increases in premium rates, by risk class, are capped at 15%. These increases also require the average increase for all subsidized policies insuring Pre-FIRM buildings (those constructed before the community’s first FIRM was issued) to be at least 5%.

Most individual policies cannot experience an annual rate increase in excess of 18%, unless an exception exists. Exceptions exist for the following types of property, and the annual premium rate increase is capped at 25% per year:

Non-primary residences (i.e., secondary homes, seasonal dwellings, homes rented to others, apartment buildings);
Severe repetitive loss properties (primary residences that have sustained damage at least twice and for which claims have been submitted to the NFIP that meet certain criteria);
Buildings that have been substantially damaged or improved; and
Beginning in 2016, the 25% premium rate cap will apply to commercial buildings.
An annual surcharge now applies to all flood insurance policies issued by the NFIP and its WYO insurers. The purpose of the surcharge is to offset the subsidies provided by NFIP’s Grandfather Rule and support the NFIP’s financial stability. The annual surcharge is paid at the time of application for a new policy and at each renewal thereafter; it will be collected until all subsidies are eliminated.

The surcharge per policy is $25 for primary residences insured on a Dwelling Form and $250 for all other types of buildings. Insurers are required to verify a building’s status as a primary residence before applying the $25 surcharge.

In order to receive the $25 surcharge instead of the $250 surcharge, the policyholder or agent must submit a statement to the insurer with a Verification of Primary Residence Form.

The verification form requires one of the following documents to be submitted along with it:

Driver’s license;
Auto registration;
Proof of vehicle insurance;
Voter registration;
Homestead tax credit form for primary residence; or
A document that shows where children attend school.
Failure to submit the form within 30 days of the date the form is mailed by the insurer to the insured will result in the $250 surcharge being issued on the renewal policy.

Eligibility for the $25 surcharge is explicit. The building must be

An owner-occupied, single-family, detached residence, or an individual condominium; and
The policyholder’s primary residence.
Because a flood insurance policy is issued with the annual surcharge, the probation surcharge, and the Federal Policy Fee (these surcharges and fees are not considered part of the premium), the actual increase in the amount a policyholder must pay may increase more than 18%. Because the surcharge is not considered a premium, it is not subject to a cap or limitation.

Building Use Questionnaire
Agents must be sure to confirm the use of an insured building prior to renewal to be sure the policyholder is charged the appropriate rate increase and annual surcharge. The NFIP Building Use Questionnaire can be completed by either the policyholder or the agent to determine whether the policy insures a nonresidential business property, or other nonresidential property. Implementation of this identification process is November 1, 2015 and the associated premium rate increases will begin in the spring of 2016.

The following information requires verification:

Is the building a non-residential business building or another non-residential building?
Is the building’s purpose mixed use and, if so, what are the percentages of use? 
Is the insured a small business with fewer than 100 employees?
Is the insured a nonprofit organization?
Is the insured building a house of worship?
Is the insured building an agricultural structure?
The NFIP considers a building to be a “business” building if a licensed commercial enterprise operates to generate income and the policy provides insurance for one of the following:

A building designed for use as a non-habitational building;
A mixed-use building in which the total floor area devoted to commercial use is more than 25% of the total floor area in the building; or
A building designed for use as an office, retail or wholesale space, hospitality area, and/or similar uses.
The NFIP considers a building to be an “other nonresidential” building if it is used for non-habitational or mixed-use purposes that do not qualify the building as a residential building or nonresidential “business” building.

25% Rate Increases
Annual rate increases of 25% apply to non-primary residences and properties that experience severe repetitive loss. The increases apply on a rate class basis and not to individual policies. The annual 25% rate increase will continue until the full-risk rate is achieved. On occasion, a policy will renew and, afterward, will become a severe repetitive loss property or a non-primary residence and may experience a premium rate increase in excess of 25%. This condition is considered a “misrating” and is considered an exception to the mandated annual rate caps of 18% and 25%.

Buildings that have been substantially damaged or improved will also experience annual premium rate increases of 25% until they have achieved the full-risk rate.

Reserve Fund Assessment
The Reserve Fund Assessment that was enacted under Biggert-Waters will be phased in over time to comply with the 15% cap on average annual premium increases. It has been increased to 15% for all policies except Preferred Risk Policies (PRPs), for which it will be 10%.

Federal Policy Fee (FPF)
The Federal Policy Fee (FPF) remains at $22 for Preferred Risk Policies, but increased for all other policies except Residential Condominium Building Association Policies (RCBAPs). The new $45 FPF will apply to policies that were rated previously under the PRP Extension (which are now rated under Properties Newly Mapped into the SFHA and will be discussed later), and policies effective on or after 04/01/2015 that insure buildings newly mapped into a SFHA by a map revision effective on or after March 21, 2014 (the date the HFIAA was enacted).

The annual FPFs for RCBAPs per policy are as follows:

$45 for a single-unit building;
$135 for a building with 2 to 4 units;
$360 for a building with 5 to 10 units;
$720 for a building with 11 to 20 units; and
$1,800 for a building with more than 20 units.
Deductibles
Under the HFIAA, the maximum deductible for policies insuring residential buildings was increased to $10,000. However, when a policyholder chooses this deductible, it must apply to both building and contents.

Minimum deductibles for PRPs and Mortgage Portfolio Protection Program policies are $1,000 for both building and contents if the building limit of insurance is no more than $100,000. If the building limit of insurance is more than $100,000, the minimum deductible is $1,250.

Grandfathering
The HFIAA restored grandfathering under certain conditions. Current eligibility requires a building to be newly mapped into a SFHA after a map revision. In this circumstance, the policy will receive a “preferred risk premium” only for the year following the map revision. Thereafter, the policy’s premium rates will be subject to the annual premium rate increase caps that apply to other policies. Beginning on the first renewal, these policies must be rated using the newly created rate tables for Property Newly Mapped into the SFHA.

If a property owner does not have flood insurance in place on a building that is being newly mapped into an SFHA, the owner MUST purchase flood insurance before the date the new map becomes effective in order to be eligible for grandfathering.

2. New Florida Law Updates
Flood Insurance
According to the OIR, the state of Florida pays four times more into the NFIP than it receives in claim payments and is the state with the largest number of NFIP policyholders. Due to the potential negative effects of flood insurance pricing increases resulting from enactment of Biggert-Waters and the HFIAA, the Florida Legislature enacted Senate Bill 542 to facilitate the writing of flood insurance in Florida by private insurance companies.

This process offers consumers with an alternative to purchasing flood insurance from the NFIP and its WYO carriers; it also provides different types of flood insurance.

The following charts obtained from the OIR website indicate the names of insurance companies writing flood insurance in Florida as of October 2015:

Primary Flood Writers
American Home Assurance Company	www.aig.com
American Strategic Insurance Corporation	www.americanstrategic.com 
American Summit Insurance Company	www.american-summit.com/
Chartis Property Casualty Company	www.aig.com
Federal Insurance Company	www.chubb.com
Firemans Fund Insurance Company 	www.firemansfund.com
Homeowners Choice Property & Casualty 	www.hcpci.com
Excess of NFIP Flood Writers
American Home Assurance Company	www.aig.com
American Strategic Insurance Corporation	www.americanstrategic.com 
Bankers Insurance Company	www.bankersinsurance.com
Chartis Property Casualty Company	www.aig.com
Federal Insurance Company	www.chubb.com
Firemans Fund Insurance Company 	www.firemansfund.com
Markel American Insurance Company
www.markelcorp.com
Privilege Underwriters Reciprocal Exchange	www.pureinsurance.com
Wright National Flood Insurance Company	www.wrightflood.com
Surplus Lines Flood Writers (Primary Only) *
Lloyds Underwriters (c/o The Flood Insurance Agency in Gainesville, FL)
www.thefloodinsuranceagency.com 
* While surplus lines carriers do not file rates and forms with the Office, the Office is aware of the following surplus lines carrier that is actively writing primary flood insurance.
Florida Insurance Commissioner's Press Release: April 1, 2015

A growing number of private insurers are now writing flood insurance in Florida; some are offering coverage at pricing lower than that offered by the NFIP.
NFIP premiums for Florida policyholders may increase by up to 18% due to changes relating to the enactment of the HFIAA.
In 2014, the average premium for a NFIP flood insurance policy in Florida was $529.
In 2014, the average NFIP flood insurance claim in Florida was $22,251.
The enactment of Senate Bill 542 streamlines the process for private insurers to write flood insurance in Florida, provides an alternative to the NFIP, and allows three different types of flood insurance to be offered by private insurers-all of which began with the basic coverage provided by the standard flood insurance policy offered by the NFIP.
Outcome of Senate Bill 542
When the OIR reviews certain insurer rate filings, projected flood losses have been added to the factors it must consider. In addition, the Commission must adopt actuarial methods, principals, standards, and/or models for personal lines residential flood loss no later than July 2017.

A new section of the Florida Insurance Code now permits authorized insurers to issue personal lines residential policies that insure against the peril of flood on any structure or its personal property. This new law does not apply to any type of commercial lines property coverage insuring against the peril of flood (including residential) or excess flood insurance. When issuing personal lines flood insurance, carriers may do so on a standard, preferred, customized, or supplemental basis.

When issuing standard flood insurance, coverage can only be provided for the peril of flood (as defined below) that is substantially the same as coverage provided by the NFIP’s standard flood insurance policy. Standard flood insurance issued by private insurers in Florida must also provide the same deductibles and loss adjustment methods provided by the NFIP’s standard flood insurance policy.

When issuing preferred flood insurance, coverage must be provided on the same basis as a standard flood insurance policy; however, it may also

Include in the definition of flood losses from water intrusion that originates from outside the insured structure that are not otherwise covered under the policy’s definition of flood;
Include coverage for additional living expense (this coverage is NOT provided by any of the NFIP’s flood policies); and
Require that any losses for personal property (contents) that are repaired or replaced only be adjusted on a replacement cost basis up to the policy’s limits.
When issuing customized flood insurance, coverage must be broader than that provided under standard flood insurance.

When issuing flexible flood insurance, coverage may be issued on the same basis as standard or preferred flood insurance; however, it must also include one or more of the following provisions:

An agreement between the insurance company and insured that flood insurance is issued in a specified amount (i.e., limited to the total amount of an outstanding mortgage on the insured property);
A requirement for a deductible in an amount permitted by law (under §627.701 Liability of Insureds, Coinsurance, Deductibles), including a hurricane deductible;
A requirement that a flood loss to a dwelling is adjusted on a replacement cost basis in accordance with Insurance Code (under §626.7011(3)) or only on the basis of the property’s actual cash value;
A restriction that limits flood insurance to the principal building defined in the policy;
A provision that either includes or excludes coverage for additional living expenses; or
A provision that excludes coverage for personal property (contents) against the peril of flood.
When issuing supplemental flood insurance, coverage must be designed to supplement coverage provided by either

The NFIP’s standard flood insurance policy; or
Standard or preferred flood insurance issued by a private insurer in Florida.
However, supplemental flood insurance is not required to (but may) provide coverage for jewelry, art, deductibles, and additional living expenses.

Under Florida law, the definition of flood is the same as the definition contained in the NFIP’s policies:

Flood means a general and temporary condition of partial or complete inundation of two or more acres of normally dry land area or of two or more properties, at least one of which is the policyholder’s property, from

Overflow of inland or tidal waters;
Unusual and rapid accumulation or runoff of surface waters from any source;
Mudflow; or
Collapse or subsidence of land along the shore of a lake or similar body of water as a result of erosion or undermining caused by waves or currents of water exceeding anticipated cyclical levels that result in a flood as defined in this paragraph.
Other requirements of the newly enacted insurance laws pertaining to flood insurance include:

All policy limits of insurance and deductibles must be displayed prominently on the policy’s Declarations page;
Surplus lines agents may export flood insurance policies or endorsements to eligible surplus lines insurers without making a diligent effort to obtain coverage from three or more insurers, as typically required;
Insurers providing private flood insurance in Florida must, in addition to other applicable requirements notify the OIR, at least 30 days in advance, before writing flood insurance in Florida;
Requiring an agent to offer a flood insurance quote when quoting an insurance policy that will cover a residential structure located within a special flood hazard area;
Requiring the agent to maintain a record of an insured's declination of flood insurance coverage for a period of 36 months;
Revising the notice that must be provided to and acknowledged by an applicant for flood coverage from an authorized or surplus lines insurer if the applicant's property is receiving flood insurance under the National Flood Insurance Program;
Allowing an authorized insurer to request a certification from the Office of Insurance Regulation which indicates that a policy, contract, or endorsement issued by the insurer provides coverage for the peril of flood which equals or exceeds the flood coverage offered by the National Flood Insurance Program;
Authorizing the insurer receiving such a certificate or its agent to reference or include the certification in specified advertising, communications, and documentation; and
Requiring that if the Office of Insurance Regulation (Office) finds flood rates are excessive or unfairly discriminatory, the Office must appropriately credit existing policyholders or refund those not still insured by the insurer.
The following entities may NOT provide insurance for the peril of flood:

Citizens Property Insurance Corporation; and
The Florida Hurricane Catastrophe Fund.
Any insurance company or agent who knowingly misrepresents that a flood insurance policy, contract, or endorsement is certified as such under Florida Insurance Code is guilty of committing an unfair method of competition or an unfair or deceptive act.

Eligibility for Coverage by Citizens Property Insurance Corporation
NFIP underwriting guidelines usually prohibit the issuance of flood insurance on property located within the Coastal Barrier Resources System (CBRS). In addition, state law prohibits Citizens Property Insurance Corporation (Citizens) from insuring a “major structure” that has been newly constructed or substantially improved if it is located seaward of the coastal construction control line or within the CBRS.

A major structure is defined by Florida law to be a house, mobile home, apartment building, condominium, motel, hotel, restaurant, tower, other types of buildings (including residential, commercial, or public), and other construction that has the potential for substantial impact on coastal zones. A substantial improvement in Florida is interpreted to mean any repair, reconstruction, rehabilitation, or improvement to a structure that costs 50% or more of the structure’s market value.

House Bill 715; effective July 1, 2015; Amends §§627.351 and 627.712, F.S.: This new piece of legislation replaces former legislation that prohibited the issuance of insurance a major structure that was substantially improved after obtaining a building permit that was applied for on or after July 1, 2015, with a prohibition that states coverage cannot be issued on a structure that is "rebuilt, repaired, restored, or remodeled to increase the total square footage of finished area by more than 25%" based on a building permit applied for after July 1, 2015.
NFIP Elevation Certificate Records
The Florida legislature passed and the governor signed into law Senate Bill 1094 with an effective date of July 1, 2015. This Bill modifies several sections of Florida statute related to flood insurance.

We have already discussed the changes this Bill made to 627.715, F.S. which directly affect the Insurance Code, but other sections of this Bill, while not directly related to Florida Insurance Code, address the peril of flood from a land use and insurance standpoint. Senate Bill 1094 also amended 163.3178, F.S. to require the redevelopment component of the coastal management element of local government comprehensive plans to do the following:

Include development and redevelopment principles, strategies, and engineering solutions that reduce the flood risk in coastal areas;
Encourage the use of best practices and identify site development techniques to reduce flood losses;
Be consistent with or more stringent than flood-resistant construction techniques in the Florida Building Code and applicable federal flood plain management regulations; and
Encourage local governments to participate in the federal flood insurance program community rating system.
Senate Bill 1094 also created 195.088, F.S. which, beginning January 1, 2017, requires appraisers, surveyors, and mappers to provide the Division of Emergency Management with a copy of each federal flood insurance program elevation certificate completed within 30 days of completion. The appraisers, surveyors, and mappers may redact the name of the property owner from the elevation certificate prior to submission to the Division of Emergency Management. These sections of Senate Bill 1094 seek to mitigate flooding risk, gather additional flood hazard mapping data through elevation certificates and increase participation in the NFIP community rating system.

Other P&C Insurance Changes in 2015
Residential Property Insurance – Advance Notice of Cancellation
Insurance companies that issue residential property insurance are now required to provide 120 days' advance written notice of nonrenewal, cancellation, or termination, regardless of the reason or when the policy is being terminated. Prior law called for 100 days’ advance written notice, which was subject to other conditions based on the policy’s termination date.

Motor Vehicle Insurance
Pre-Inspection Requirement: Florida law requires insurers to inspect private passenger motor vehicles before issuing physical damage coverage, including collision and comprehensive coverages. An exemption to this requirement exists for an insured who has had insurance in place continuously for at least two years if the agent verifies the existence of the prior coverage and the fact that it was not interrupted. New legislation extends this exemption to “any” vehicle, not just private passenger vehicles.

The new law also allows leased vehicles to be exempt from pre-inspection requirements. Insurance companies have the option of electing to require the submission of certain documents when issuing coverage without requiring a pre-inspection. The vehicle’s dealer invoice is no longer one of the documents the insurer may require; however, the vehicle’s registration has been added to the list of documents the insurer may require. The processes of issuing claim reimbursements and suspending physical damage coverage are now based upon when the supporting documents are delivered to the insurer.

House Bill 4011; effective July 1, 2015; Amends §§627.041 and 627.728: Before enactment of this law, private passenger auto insurance policies were limited to provide coverage for no more than 4 vehicles per policy. If a consumer owned more than 4 vehicles, they were required to obtain additional policies in sufficient number to comply with this requirement.

Upon enactment of House Bill 4011, insurance companies may issue private passenger auto insurance policies that insure any number of private passenger motor vehicles. To effect this outcome, the law removed the 4-vehicle maximum from the insurance law rating definition of motor vehicle insurance, and from the regulatory definition of policy.

Ethical Requirements
1. Ethical Code
Florida insurance laws and rules contain requirements that specify how the Department will apply ethical standards of conduct to the manner in which licensed insurance agents interact with other agents, insurance companies, and the public.

NAIFA Code of Ethics
Preamble

Helping my clients protect their assets and establish financial security, independence, and economic freedom for themselves and those they care about is a noble endeavor and deserves my promise to support high standards of integrity, trust, and professionalism throughout my career as an insurance and financial professional. With these principles as a foundation, I freely accept the following obligations:

To help maintain my clients’ confidences and protect their right to privacy.
To work diligently to satisfy the needs of my clients.
To present, accurately and honestly, all facts essential to my clients’ financial decisions.
To render timely and proper service to my clients and ultimately their beneficiaries.
To continually enhance professionalism by developing my skills and increasing my knowledge through education.
To obey the letter and spirit of all laws and regulations which govern my profession. 
To conduct all business dealings in a manner which would reflect favorably on NAIFA and my profession.
To cooperate with others whose services best promote the interests of my clients.
To protect the financial interests of my clients, their financial products and my profession, through political advocacy.
Adopted July 2012, NAIFA Board of Trustees

When adhering to a universal code of ethics, agents working in the insurance industry in this state are more likely to comply with state law, present themselves to the public as a member of a cohesive unit, one that works in partnership with other members of the insurance and business communities, and exhibit behavior that displays professionalism and encourages trust and confidence.

Use of Insurance Designations
A professional designation is a certification that its designee has undertaken specialized education and training in his or her field. Some designations are very specific and focus on a single, specific topic, such as the Associate in Risk Management (ARM) designation. The focus of other designations is broader and more comprehensive, such as the Chartered Property Casualty Underwriter (CPCU) designation, which certifies the designee’s knowledge and expertise the property and casualty segment of the insurance industry, including the areas of insurance operations, business law, finance and accounting, commercial property and liability risk management, personal insurance, personal risk management, and financial planning. The CPCU designation also requires designees to pass a 50-question exam on ethics.

Unfortunately, some insurance agents claim to have expertise that they have not, in fact, acquired. Because this misuse of designations often harms consumers, many states have enacted laws specific to it the misuse of designations. Some such state legislation only addresses misuse pertaining to seniors or particular lines of insurance (i.e. life insurance); however, Florida’s laws pertaining to the use of designations apply to “the marketing, solicitation, negotiation, sale or advice made in connection with an insurance transaction by any licensee.”

Although numerous professional insurance designations can be attained, the Florida Department of Financial Services does not endorse any of them; it does, however, have specific definitions for the phrases "designation" and "certification."

Designation

Any combination of words, any acronym standing for a combination of words, or any job title that indicates or implies that a licensee has special knowledge or training in advising or servicing consumers beyond the knowledge or training required for the license held.

Certification

Any designation that indicates, implies, or recognizes that an individual or organization meets certain established criteria beyond the criteria required for the license held.

Examples of professional insurance designations include

Certified Insurance Counselor (CIC): Pertains to expertise in personal lines, commercial property, commercial casualty, life and health, agency management, and risk management;
Accredited Advisor in Insurance (AAI): Pertains to all aspects of the property and casualty segment of the insurance industry, and specifically underwriting, commercial and personal lines, agency management, and customer service; and
Certified Risk Manager (CRM): Pertains to identifying, analyzing, controlling, financing, and administering organizational risks.
Examples of professional insurance designations include

Certified Insurance Service Representative (CISR): Focuses on nine areas within the insurance industry and each certificant must take and pass the exam for five of the nine courses within a 5-year period; and
Accredited Advisor in Insurance (ACSR): Similar to the CISR certification, this certification does not require an annual update but does allow the certificant to specialize in commercial lines, personal lines, or life and health insurance.
In Florida, it is a violation of Insurance Code for any individual to use an insurance designation or certification unless it was obtained from a professional organization with published standards and procedures for pledging the degree of expertise of those awarded the designation or certification. Specifically, the standards and procedures must be used and enforced regularly by the organization and must address specific subject matters. In addition, the organization must approve the use of its name, logo, trademark, or other marketing images and labels used by its designees and certificants.

Four specific prohibitions apply to the use of designations in Florida:

Using a designation for which an individual is not eligible or has not actually earned;
Using a nonexistent designation or one designed or created by the individual himself or herself;
Using a designation that was not acquired in compliance with the standards and procedures of the organization conferring it; and
Stating or implying that the individual has acquired a degree of expertise or qualifications through education, training, or experience that he or she has not actually acquired.
Obligations for Reporting Unlicensed Insurance Activity
Unlicensed insurance activity takes place when the person or insurance plan transacting insurance does not hold the appropriate Florida license to do so, including self-insurers. An exception exists for entities authorized to self-insure under the Workers Compensation Law. Those required to hold insurance licenses in this state include insurance companies, managed care entities, agents, sales representatives, sales agents, salespersons, runners, bail bondsmen, brokers, third-party administrators, and adjusters.

All insurance licensees are required by Florida law to notify the Department of information relating to any unlicensed insurance activity taking place in this state if and when they become aware of it. Information that must be reported includes (if known):

Organizational information about the unlicensed entity;
Information about any insurance benefits or contracts being offered by the unlicensed entity, including reinsurance;
The names, addresses, and telephone numbers of any officers or agents of the unlicensed entity; and
The names, addresses, and telephone numbers of any of the unlicensed entity’s employers, employees, enrolled individuals, or individuals who are or may be receiving services.
The most common types of entities engaging in unlicensed insurance activity in Florida are reportable Multiple Employer Welfare Arrangements (MEWAs), employee leasing arrangements, welfare benefits plans, and collectively bargained arrangement. By definition under Florida Administrative Code, an arrangement is a fund, trust, plan, instrument, program, association, union, or other entity or mechanism that provides for the transfer of the risk of loss, damage, or expense resulting from a fortuitous event to another.

All information should be reported the Department at Unlicensed Entity Coordinator, Florida Department of Financial Services, Division of Investigative and Forensic Services (formerly Division of Insurance Fraud). The report can be made by telephone (850-413-4000) or by mail to 2020 Capital Circle, S. E., Alexander Building, Tallahassee, FL 32301.

2. Unfair Trade Practices
The distinction between illegal and unethical is not always clear. When human beings behave in an ethical fashion, they do what is good, right, and proper, as determined by the society or business industry in which they live. However, what society views as good, right, and proper changes over time and based upon circumstances.

Until the early 1900s, very few insurance laws were on the books. However, when a New York journalist charged a number of life insurance companies with using company funds to spend excessively and make political payoffs over a period of several in the early 1900s, the superintendent of the New York Department of Insurance began an investigation in 1905. The New York legislature established a special committee led by Senator Armstrong (the Armstrong Committee), which eventually found the following unethical practices were being conducted by the Equitable Life Assurance Society:

Creating subsidiaries to dodge restrictions on investments;
Proxy voting to interfere with policyholder control of mutual insurance companies;
Allowing members of its Board of Directors to serve on the board of directors of multiple companies;
Incurring lavish company expenses;
Spending far more on lobbying activities than its competitors;
Rebating;
Encouragement of policy lapses to write new insurance; and
Encouraging twisting.
Although several other insurers were found to have committed incidents of unethical conduct, none was publicized as extensively as Equitable was. Because of the Armstrong Committee’s findings, the state of New York enacted insurance legislation in 1907; this action was followed by other states after they conducted their own investigations. Many of the laws passed by New York were considered overly strict by many in the industry; however, they were necessary for the protection of the policyholders. These included

Prohibition against preferred dividend policies and the requirement that policyholders be paid regular dividends;
Regulations that stipulated what investments were “acceptable”;
Limits on campaign contributions and lobbying activity;
Elimination of proxy voting;
Standardizing policy forms; and
Limiting agent activity by outlawing certain practices such as rebating and twisting.
Traditionally, the majority of the insurance industry’s regulation in the United States has taken place at the state level. However, in 1944, litigation occurred that challenged the states’ authority with respect to how insurers conducted business across state lines (i.e., as acts of interstate commerce).

As a result of landmark litigation that was heard by the Supreme Court (United States v. South-Eastern Underwriters Association), the McCarran-Ferguson Act became law in 1945 and stipulates that the federal government can only regulate the business of insurance to the extent one or more of the states do not regulate it. A notable exception to McCarran-Ferguson is the federal government’s jurisdiction over antitrust issues such as boycott, coercion, and intimidation.

Restraint of Trade
In order to understand why the states regulate the business practices of insurance companies, agents, and other licensees, it is important to possess an overall understanding of how business operations affect the economy of our country. One of the most harmful business endeavors to a society is a monopoly.

A monopoly is a single entity that owns and controls the majority of the marketplace for a specific product or service. By its nature, a monopoly eliminates competition, which, in turn, generally results in an increase in prices and a decrease in the quality of the product or service being provided. While beneficial to the owners of a monopoly, monopolistic practices seldom benefit others, especially consumers. Some argue that when big business is not permitted to control a market, more issues arise for consumers because smaller businesses do not have the ability to provide the same high quality of products and services, or access to them. However, the federal government and the states do not embrace this philosophy.

In the United States, anti-trust laws prevent the establishment of monopolies; these laws are contained in Title 15 of United States Code (USC), which addresses Commerce and Trade. The earliest anti-trust legislation in the United States, the Sherman Antitrust Act (1890) and the Clayton Antitrust Act (1914), set out to eliminate the monopolistic practices of restraining competition through boycott, coercion, intimidation, and price-fixing agreements.

In an effort to support the intention of Congress as stated in the McCarran-Ferguson Act, the National Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC) drafted model law concerning unfair trade practices in the business of insurance. The NAIC’s Unfair Trade Practices Act defines practices that represent unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts in the insurance industry. Each of the states has adopted the NAIC’s model, in either its entirety or a modified version.

Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act
In Florida, the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act is spelled out in §§626.951 through 626.99 of the Florida Statutes. It applies to

All persons involved in the business of insurance, including individuals, corporations, associations, partnerships, reciprocal exchanges, interinsurers, Lloyd’s insurers, fraternal benefit societies, business trusts, and other entities; and
All insurance policies and insurance contracts, which are written agreements, contracts, and certificates that effect insurance, regardless of what they are called; this includes all riders, endorsements, provisions, clauses, and documents attached to the agreements, contracts, and certificate.
Florida Insurance Code lists and defines the unfair and deceptive trade practices that are prohibited. If any person engages in a prohibited practice, fines and penalties are severe:

Up to $5,000 for each unintentional violation, with a $20,000 aggregate applicable to insurers for all violations stemming from the same action;
Up to $40,000 for each knowing and deliberate violation, with a $200,000 aggregate applicable to insurers for all violations stemming from the same action;
For the commission of “twisting” or “churning,” which are first-degree misdemeanors:
A criminal penalty of imprisonment up to 1 year and an administrative fine up to $5,000 for each unintentional violation; or
A criminal penalty of imprisonment up to 1 year and an administrative fine up to $75,000 for each knowing and deliberate violation (this administrative fine only applies if the act involves fraudulent conduct);
For knowingly and deliberately submitting a fraudulent signature on an insurance application or insurance policy-related document, which is a third-degree felony:
A criminal penalty of imprisonment up to 5 years; or
An administrative fine up to $5,000 for each unintentional violation and $75,000 for each knowing and deliberate violation; and
Unless stated otherwise, the aggregate amount of any administrative fines stemming from the same action is $50,000 for unintentional violations and $250,000 for knowing and deliberate violations.
In addition to the prohibitions contained in Florida’s Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, agents should keep in mind the following requirements:

All licensees are required to make every reasonable effort to determine the age of an insurance applicant at the time the application is taken; and
If a victim of an unfair insurance trade practice is a senior citizen, a video deposition of the victim may be used for any purpose in an administrative proceeding that is conducted according to law.
Prohibited Acts and Practices - Definitions
The following acts and practices are deemed unfair methods of competition and deceptive acts; all are prohibited.

Misrepresentation and false advertising of insurance policies is the prohibited process of knowingly and deliberately making any type of estimate, illustration, presentation, comparison, or omission that misrepresents anything to do with an insurance policy. This includes the policy’s coverages, benefits, advantages, conditions, terms, provisions, and dividends. It also includes:

Making a false or misleading statement about the insurer’s financial condition;
Using a policy name or title that is misleading as to the true nature of the policy; or
Making a misrepresentation to encourage a consumer to lapse, terminate, exchange, convert, or surrender a policy or to take a loan out against a policy.
False information and advertising generally involves knowingly and deliberately publishing an advertisement, announcement, or statement to the public about any insurance matter that is untrue, deceptive, or misleading. This prohibited practice includes content placed in any of the following:

Newspapers, magazines, and other publications;
Notices, circulars, pamphlets, letters, and posters; or
Radio and television ads.
Defamation is the forbidden act of knowingly and deliberately making any type of verbal or written statement about any person that is (a) untrue, malicious, or derogatory and (b) intended to injure that person.

Entering into an agreement with the intention to create a monopoly, or restrain trade, in the insurance business by committing the acts of boycott, coercion, or intimidation is prohibited.

A person makes false statements and entries when deliberately making any false material statement in a filing with a supervisory or public official or to, or placed before, the public. In addition, a person makes prohibited false statements and entries when deliberately making a false entry of material fact pertaining to the insurance business in a book, report, or statement; this includes omitting a pertinent material fact.

Issuing, delivering, or promising agency company stock, capital stock, benefit certificates or shares, securities, or advisory board contacts that promise returns or profits as an encouragement to purchase insurance is the prohibited practice of stock operations and advisory board contracts. 

A person commits the outlawed practice of unfair discrimination when

Knowingly making or permitting unfair discrimination in premiums, policy fees, or rates charged between risks of the same rate class that have essentially the same hazard;
To increase rates, underwrite, or refuse issuance, reissuance, or renewal of a policy based upon the fact that an applicant or proposed insured submitted a claim, should have submitted a claim, or might submit a claim for abuse, protection or shelter from abuse, or assault, battery, or sexual assault by a family member; and
With respect to personal lines property or auto insurance:
For an insurer to refuse to issue, renew, or reissue a policy, or to cancel or terminate insurance, based on the lawful use, possession, or ownership of a firearm or ammunition by the applicant or insured; however, insurers may charge an actuarially sound additional premium for insuring firearms and firearms collections insured by endorsement; or
For an insurer to disclose the lawful ownership or possession of firearms of an applicant, insured, or household member of either to a third party or affiliate without complying with express and specific disclosure requirements.
The following conduct is considered making unlawful rebates:

Making any agreement pertaining to an insurance contract that is not expressly stated in the contract itself;
Paying or allowing the payment of, in any fashion, any of the following as an inducement to buy insurance if not specified in the insurance policy: premium rebate, special favor or advantage in dividends or policy benefits, or anything of value; and
Selling, giving, or allowing the sale or gift of any of the following as an inducement to buy insurance if not specified in the insurance policy: stocks, bonds, securities, dividends, or anything of value.
However, with respect to group insurance, it is NOT illegal to readjust premium rates based on losses and expenses of the contract at the end of each policy year.

It is unlawful for any person to fail to maintain a complete record of all complaints received since the last examination by the Office or Department. A complaint is any written communication that has as its primary purpose the statement of ill-treatment.

When a person makes a misrepresentation in insurance applications, he or she knowingly making a false or fraudulent statement (verbal or written) when submitting an insurance application for the purpose of obtaining a fee, commission, money, or other benefit from any insurer, agent, broker, or individual.

Twisting is the practice of knowingly making an incomplete, misleading, or fraudulent comparison, or a material and fraudulent omission of any insurance policy or insurance company for the purpose of encouraging any person to lapse, forfeit, surrender, cancel, keep, assign, borrow on, or convert any insurance policy; this includes the purchase of a new or replacement policy using these prohibited actions.

Licensees may offer advertising gifts to clients, prospective clients, and others. Advertising gifts are marketing and promotional materials such as pens and mugs. However, advertising gifts permitted are those offered by an insurer or its agent with a merchandise value up to $25 (i.e., cash gifts are not advertising gifts because they are not merchandise).

Advertising, offering, or providing free insurance is prohibited in Florida. Free insurance is insurance for which no identifiable and additional charge is made to one who purchases real property, personal property, or services. Free insurance is also insurance for which a charge is made but in an amount less than the cost of insurance on the property or services being insured.

Types of insurance that are exempt from this prohibition include blanket disability, credit life, credit disability, title, purchase agreements for cemetery lots (under stated conditions), travel insurance sold by a travel agency as part of a travel package.

It is illegal to use the word “free” or other phrases that imply insurance is being provided without a cost when advertising life or disability insurance or when offering goods, merchandise, or services for sale.

Certain practices are considered illegal dealings in premiums — excess or reduced charges for insurance:

Collecting a premium payment for insurance when knowing insurance will not be accepted or provided by the insurer;
Collecting an insurance premium payment when knowing it is the wrong premium amount, i.e., it is higher or lower than the actual premium; this prohibition does not apply to the collection of surplus lines taxes and fees or fees charged in connection with the use of a credit card;
Cancelling an existing policy during the policy term for the purpose of reissuing it for similar or identical coverage at a higher premium;
Cancelling any policy in violation of the policy’s cancellation provisions, as stated in accordance with Florida Insurance Code.
With respect to auto insurance:

Charging or requesting an additional premium under any combination of liability, PIP, medical payments, or collision coverages based solely because the insured was involved in an accident (unless the insurer has determined in good faith that the insured was at-fault); this prohibition also applies to nonrenewing a policy. Under state law, an operator was NOT at-fault if he or she was
Lawfully parked at the time of the accident;
Reimbursed by or on behalf of a person responsible for the accident or against whom a judgment was rendered;
Struck in the rear by another vehicle driving in the same direction AND the operator was not convicted of a moving traffic violation in connection with the accident;
Struck by a hit-and-run driver, so long as the accident was reported to the appropriate authorities within 24 hours of the accident;
Not convicted of a moving traffic violation in connection with the accident and the other driver was convicted of a moving traffic violation in connection with the accident;
Ruled not liable by the court;
The recipient of a traffic citation that was later dismissed; or
Otherwise not deemed at fault based on the insured’s written statement that provides the facts of the accident and those facts are not disputed by information obtained by the insurer and retained in its files and for which the insurer, in good faith, determines the insured is not at fault;
Charging or requesting an additional premium based solely on the insureds non-criminal traffic violation as defined by law unless the infraction is the second infraction within an 18-month period, the third infraction within a 36-month period, or a speeding violation at more than 15 miles per hour over the speed limit; this prohibition also applies to nonrenewing a policy;
Charging or requesting an additional premium based solely on the applicant’s handicap or physical disability so long as the handicap or disability does not substantially impair the individuals mechanically assisted driving ability; this prohibition also applies to nonrenewing a policy;
Charging an unfairly discriminatory premium based solely on the age, sex, marital status, or scholastic achievement of an individual;
Charging or requesting an additional premium for comprehensive or uninsured motorists coverage based solely on the insured’s involvement in a motor vehicle accident or conviction of a moving traffic violation; or
Cancel, nonrenew, or charge or request an additional premium based on a traffic infraction for which no points were assessed by Florida law; this prohibition does not apply to traffic infractions related to accidents if the insurer paid a claim for which the insured was deemed at-fault.
The prohibition interlocking ownership and management pertains to insurance company ownership, investment, or acquisition that substantially lessens competition in the insurance business. Specifically, this refers to one insurer buying, acquiring, or managing another insurer in violation of Insurance Code or in a fashion that may potentially harm the public (i.e., create a monopoly).

Special penalties apply to those submitting false claims or obtaining or retaining money dishonestly; in addition, this type of practice is considered a second-degree misdemeanor. If any person submits a claim for payment to an insurer while knowing it is false, secures a cash advance after making false statements, or fails to turn over to an insurer money it owes, violates this prohibition.

If a person holds securities and life insurance licenses at the same time, a proposal is required to be delivered to each prospective buyer on or before any mutual funds program is delivered. Each proposal must include a prospectus that describes the investment and provides a full illustration of any related life insurance features. The licensee must retain a copy of the prospectus for at least three years and provide the original to the consumer.

Soliciting or accepting new or renewal insurance risks by insolvent or impaired insurers is prohibited. This prohibition applies to insurance company directors and officers if they know, or should have known, the insurer was insolvent or financially impaired. Individuals violating this prohibition are guilty of a third-degree felony and subject to a criminal penalty of imprisonment up to 5 years, a fine up to $5,000, or both.

It is illegal for any person to refuse to insure any individual risk based solely on

Race, color, creed, marital status, sex, or national origin;
Age, location of residence, or the type of lawful occupation;
The refusal of the applicant or insured to place other business with the insurer;
The refusal of the applicant or insured to purchase services or products that are not insurance;
The fact that the applicant or insured is a public official; or
The fact that the applicant or insured was refused insurance previously by any insurer if the refusal to insure occurs with such frequency as to indicate a general business practice.
Insurance agents and agencies are not permitted to require the execution of powers of attorney in their favor by any applicant as a condition of purchasing insurance.

Sliding is the practice of a licensee telling an applicant that a specific type of secondary insurance must be purchased, by law, in connection with the purchase of another type of insurance coverage when the licensee’s statement is accurate. Sliding also includes stating the specific secondary coverage is included in the policy without a specific additional charge, or charging an insured for specific secondary coverage without obtaining the applicant’s informed consent, when such is not the case.

Churning is the practice of an agent or insurer cancelling and rewriting insurance with the same insurer for the purpose of earning additional premiums, fees, commissions, or other compensation. This practice involves the use of existing life insurance and annuity contract cash, loan, and dividend values, as well as policy riders and is considered an unfair method of competition AND an unfair or deceptive act or practice.

Churning is illegal when the cancel/rewrite process is undertaken

Without the agent or insurer having “a reasonable basis to believe the replacement will result in an actual and demonstrable benefit to the policyholder”;
In a fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading manner, including a deceptive omission;
Without informing the applicant the existing policy’s cash, dividend, or other policy values will be reduced, forfeited, or used to purchase the replacement policy (if applicable); or
Without informing the applicant the replacement policy will not be a paid-up policy or that additional premiums will be due (if applicable).
Insurers and agents are required to provide all applicants with a Department approved form at the time of offer that explains the extent to which policy values will be used to purchase a replacing or additional policy with the same insurance company. The form must contain the policy premium, the death benefit of the proposed replacement or new policy, and the date when the existing policy’s values will become insufficient to pay the premiums of the replacement or new policy.

Licensees are not permitted to use the name or logo of a financial institution (including banks and credit unions) during marketing and solicitation of new and existing clients without the consent of the financial institution IF the marketing and solicitation infers it is conducted on behalf of, or is endorsed by, the financial institution. Such a practice is considered deceptive use of name and is prohibited.

Licensees are not permitted the unlawful use of designations or misrepresentation of their qualifications as an agent. Specifically, licensees cannot use a designation or title in any insurance sales presentation or solicitation that falsely or fraudulently implies he or she has specialized knowledge or training or is certified or qualified to provide special financial advice to senior citizens.

If the insurance cost is specified in a “price package,” the vendor or lender must state the amounts charged for insurance, along with their classifications, separately from the property or merchandise purchased. The inclusion or exclusion of the cost of insurance from the package price of the property or merchandise cannot increase, reduce, or otherwise affect any factor related of the property/merchandise, or its financing.

The following unfair claim settlement practices apply to all lines of insurance:

Attempting to settle a claim based on a policy-related document that was altered without the insured’s knowledge or consent;
Making a material misrepresentation to an insured or claimant in order to settle a claim on less favorable terms to which he or she is entitled under the policy; or
Committing or performing with such frequency as to indicate a general business practice any of the following:
Failing to adopt and use standards to investigate claims properly;
Misrepresenting pertinent facts or policy provisions pertaining to the coverages in question;
Failing to acknowledge and respond promptly when notified of a claim;
Denying claims without conducting a reasonable investigation based upon available information;
Failing to honor or deny a claim within 30 days after proof of loss statements have been submitted; this includes failure to provide written notice a claim is being investigated;
Failing to provide prompt written explanation for the denial of a claim or the offer of a compromise settlement, based on law or the policy’s provisions;
Failing to notify the insured promptly of any addition information needed to process a claim; or
Failing to explain clearly the nature of requested information and the reasons it is necessary.
The following unfair claim settlement practices apply to property and casualty insurance:

Failing to pay personal injury protection (PIP) claims within time periods required by law; and
Failing to pay undisputed amounts of full or partial benefits owed under first-party property insurance policies within 90 days after receiving notice of a residential property insurance claim after agreeing to do so unless prevented from doing so by an act of God, the impossibility of performance, fraud on the part of the insured or claimant, lack of cooperation, or an intentional misrepresentation related to the claim.
Favored Agent or Insurer
It is illegal for any person to require, as a condition of providing any type of loan or credit, that the person borrowing money or a line of credit must purchase insurance from a particular insurer, insurance group, agent, broker, or group of agents or brokers. It is also illegal for any lender or creditor to refuse to accept an insurance policy solely based on the fact it was not obtained by an insurance affiliate or subsidiary.

Hearings and Cease and Desist Orders
If a licensee is suspected of committing a prohibited insurance trade practice, the Department will conduct a hearing to determine the validity of any allegations or charges made. If, after a hearing, the Department finds that the person charged did engage in an unfair or deceptive act or practice, transacted insurance illegally, it will issue a cease and desist order.

If the person violated Insurance Code with respect to being a favored insurer or agent or prohibited practices as defined, the Department may suspend or revoke the licensee’s certificate of authority, license, or eligibility for either if the person knew or should have known he or she violated the Insurance Code. In addition, the person may be punished according to law.

Licensees may appeal any orders of the Department or Office, including cease and desist orders and penalty orders. Penalties for violating a cease and desist order include

A monetary fine of up to $50,000 for all matters that were the subject of the hearing;
Suspension or revocation of the licensee’s certificate of authority, license, or eligibility for either; or
Any other remedies permitted by Insurance Code.
Insurance Fraud
Insurance fraud has become a problem globally, as well as here in the United States. The DFS’ Division of Investigative and Forensic Services is the Department's law enforcement arm and conducts investigations for all types of insurance fraud. For example, the Division was responsible recently for the arrest of a 31-year-old insurance agent for allegedly stealing $145,000 from a client’s annuity.

In Florida, Insurance Code specifically addresses the topic of insurance fraud for the protection of consumers and insurers. A fraudulent insurance act is committed when a person deliberately and with the intention to defraud prepares or submits a written statement related to an insurance application or claim knowing it contained materially false information; this includes concealing a material fact for the purpose of misleading another.

If the Division of Investigative and Forensic Services conducts an investigation and believes a person has engaged in, or is engaging in, a fraudulent insurance act, it may gather evidence, interview witnesses, and conduct depositions. As long as a person is not acting fraudulently or in bad faith, he or she is not subject to civil liability (i.e. granted immunity) for any relevant tort, including slander and libel, for filing reports or furnishing information to the Department or Division and cannot be sued for information submitted to or received by:

Law enforcement officials and their agents or employees;
The Department, the Division, the National Insurance Crime Bureau (NICB), the National Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC), or any government officials and their agents or employees; or
Other persons.
Any and all papers, documents, reports, and evidence related to the subject of an insurance fraud investigation are confidential until the investigation is complete.

Once an investigation is complete, certain information may continue to be held confidential under certain circumstances, such as if disclosure would

Jeopardize another investigation;
Impair an insurer’s safety or soundness;
Reveal personal financial information;
Reveal the identity of a confidential source;
Defame, jeopardize the safety of, or cause undue harm to the good name or reputation of an individual; or
Reveal investigatory techniques or procedures.
The Division’s investigators have the authority to make arrests for criminal violations and are considered state law enforcement officers. They may also issue arrest and search warrants, serve subpoenas, and carry firearms (if legally licensed) while on duty.

Insurers with $10 million or more in direct written premiums are required by Florida Insurance Code to establish and maintain a fraud unit or division or contract with one or more third parties to investigate potentially fraudulent insurance claims. Insurers with less than $10 million in direct written premiums must file an anti-fraud plan with the Division no later than July 1.

Failure of an insurer to establish a fraud unit or file an anti-fraud plan as required by law will result in an administrative fine up to $2,000 per day it is not in compliance.

The Department has established an Anti-Fraud Reward Program that pays rewards up to $25,000 to those who provide information that leads to the arrest and conviction of the following violations if they are investigated by the Division:

Any willful violation of Insurance Code or an order of the Department, Office, or Commission;
Any defined unfair method of competition and unfair or deceptive act or practice;
Any fraudulent insurance act; or
Submission of a false and fraudulent insurance claim.
Only one reward may be paid for all claims arising out of the same transaction or occurrence, regardless of the number of people arrested, convicted, or submitting a claim for a reward. A single reward may be distributed to more than one person by the Department in amounts it determines. The DFS website reports that this program has awarded a total of $350,000 to 60 citizens.

Licensees who knows or believes insurance fraud is taking place, or has taken place, is required to report all pertinent information to the Division of Investigative and Forensic Services. Upon receipt of a report, the Division will review the information it contains and determine if an investigation is warranted. If conducting an investigation, the Division will report all violations of insurance law it discovers to the appropriate licensing authority and state/prosecuting agency having jurisdiction.

3. Required Premium Discounts
In Florida, property insurance carriers are required by law to provide specific premium discounts. Required premium discounts include those related to:

Policyholders who take measures to mitigate hurricane and wind damage to their buildings;
The issuance of hurricane, wind, and hail deductibles; and
Certain auto insurance endorsements.

Industry and Disciplinary Trends
1. Unauthorized Entities and Products
The sale of unauthorized insurance in Florida is illegal. Agents who sell or solicit insurance for unauthorized entities:

Violate Florida Insurance Code;
May be held liable for losses sustained by their clients that are not paid by the unauthorized entity; and
May be charged with a third degree felony that is punishable by imprisonment for up to 5 years and a monetary fine up to $5,000 for a first offense.
It is important for all insurance licensees to understand what an unauthorized insurance entity is, what types of products they sell, and what the consequences of the sale of unauthorized insurance are. Simply put, an unauthorized insurance entity does not have a license to transact the business of insurance within the jurisdiction.

Warning Signs
Many agents have a difficult time imagining how an unauthorized entity can convince a licensed professional it is authorized to transact insurance. However, many marketing representatives appear legitimate and are able to convince licensees and consumers alike that their products are superior to the competition’s products and that they are less expensive. Sales materials prepared by unauthorized entities often appear impressive, being accompanied by letters from insurance regulators and other organizations that make them appear legitimate.

Warning signs that a company is an unauthorized entity include

The premium is at least 25% lower than its competitors’ premiums AND the company claims its product is more comprehensive than other products. This is a difficult temptation to resist, especially for prospective insureds with few financial resources.
The insurer has few, if any, underwriting guidelines or its only eligibility requirement is for applicants to join a trade association, union, or affinity group to earn eligibility for coverage.
The insurer claims to be exempt from state insurance regulation because it is regulated under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act (ERISA) (i.e., the federal government). Although some plans may actually be regulated by ERISA, this claim is the number one indicator of unauthorized entities because most agents are not familiar with federal insurance regulations and dismiss any irregularities as being related to the difference between state and federal insurance regulations.
The company’s advertising and sales materials refer to benefits rather than insurance and refer to the policy as a health benefit plan instead. In some cases, company representatives and agents actually ask the applicant not to use the term insurance when discussing the plan.
The insurer claims to be a Multiple Employer Welfare Arrangement (MEWA), which is an entity that, according to the Department of Labor’s Employee Benefits Security Administration (EBSA) “provides health and welfare benefits to employees of two or more unrelated employers that are not parties to a bona fide collective bargaining agreement.) While many MEWAs are formed legally, many others are not. Because MEWAs often use the employer’s premium payments to pay benefits directly to employees rather than to buy insurance, they are very attractive products for unauthorized entities to sell.
The company will offer investments that are, in fact, unregistered securities (i.e., communications equipment companies and real estate and land development opportunities).
The company will claim to be a self-funded health plan, which is not the same thing as a fully insured employee benefit plan. A self-funded health plan is insurance that is paid fully by the employer, which, in turn, pays benefits directly to employees. Most self-funded plans are not regulated by the state but are regulated by ERISA.
The company will sell a union plan, or collective bargaining arrangement. These plans are legal contracts between a labor union and an employer and, because they are not MEWAs, are subject to state insurance regulation. However, many unauthorized entities claim to be collective bargaining agreements or arrangements to avoid ERISA regulations.
Professional employer organizations (PEOs), which used to be referred to as employee leasing companies, that sponsor health plans are not subject to ERISA regulations because they do not involve an employer/employee relationship. The individuals they hire out are not employees of the PEO; they are employees of the companies to whom the PEO hire them out. Because of the many regulatory requirements of PEOs that sponsor health plans, unauthorized entities favor this type of organization because businesses find their complexity difficult to follow and they often simply trust the “agent” selling them.
How to Determine if a Company is Authorized
The Florida DFS holds agents responsible for exhibiting due diligence and confirming the insurance companies they represent are authorized to transact insurance in this state and to verify that an investment is registered. The DFS assists licensees in their efforts to verify that all insurers they represent are authorized to transact insurance in this state.

The first action an agent should take before representing any insurance company is to visit the OIR website at http://www.floir.com/CompanySearch/ to verify whether it is authorized to do business in Florida. Because many insurance companies share similar names, agents should be sure to obtain the full legal name of the insurer. If the insurer’s name is returned after completing a search, it has authority to transact insurance in Florida if its Authorization Status is active and any of the following appear in its Authorization Type:

Certificate of Authority;
Information Only;
Letter of Approval;
Letter of Eligibility;
Letter of Registration;
License;
Provisional Certificate of Authority; or
Residual Market.
If the Authorization Status is active and the Authorization Type is permit, the insurer is NOT yet authorized to transact insurance in Florida because it has only begun the authorization process.

If the insurance company is not listed on the website or if it has an Authorization Status that is not “active” or an Authorization Type not listed above, AGENTS SHOULD ASSUME THE ENTITY IS UNAUTHORIZED AND NOT PLACE BUSINESS WITH THAT INSURER.
If an insurance company is a surplus lines insurer, agents can verify its authority by visiting the website of the National Association of Professional Surplus Lines Offices, Ltd. (NAPSLO) to search for a member company at https://www.napslo.org/wcm/Members/Find_A_NAPSLO_Member/wcm/_iCore/Contacts/Members.aspx?hkey=37a0f747-50e3-4168-ada8-ff372711c577.

The Financial Industry Regulatory Authority (FINRA) website contains a page “Ask and Check” that allows consumers and agents to verify if the seller of an investment is licensed to sell it and if an investment is registered with the Securities Exchange Commission (SEC). The website can be found at http://www.finra.org/investors/ask-and-check.

2. Recent Enforcement Actions
Third Degree Felony: License Revoked
In October 2016, a life/variable producer had his agent license revoked, and is barred from reapplying for licensure for 7 years after a conviction for cocaine possession. Licensing rules require that a producer convicted of a crime (in this case, a third-degree felony) must immediately report the conviction to the Florida regulator. This individual self-reported the conviction and after an administrative hearing, had his license revoked.

FINRA Violation: License Revoked
A Florida agent licensed for life, variable annuity, health, and general lines had her license revoked in 2016 after the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority (FINRA) fined her more than $50,000 and suspended her FINRA registration for 18 months for violating Section 5 of the Securities Act of 1933 (unregistered distribution of securities).

The agent failed to notify or obtain permission from her member firms after earning private sales commissions of nearly $40,000. She advised multiple customers to purchase unregistered securities without conduct adequate due diligence or suitability evaluations. Under Florida statutes, it is a violation for an "agent to have been the subject of or to have had a license, permit, appointment, registration, or other authority to conduct business subject to any decision, finding, injunction, suspension, prohibition, revocation, denial, judgment, final agency action, or administrative order by any court of competent jurisdiction, administrative law proceeding, state agency, federal agency, national securities, commodities, or option exchange, or national securities, commodities, or option association involving a violation of any federal or state securities or commodities law or any rule or regulation adopted thereunder, or a violation of any rule or regulation of any national securities, commodities, or options exchange or national securities, commodities, or options association." The agent is permitted to apply for reinstatement of her license and appointments in 2 years when the suspension is over.

False Application: License Revoked
In 2016, a Clearwater agent was found to have submitted seven false and fraudulent life insurance applications for the sole purpose of receiving commissions. An audit undertaken by the issuing insurer determined that the applications were false and that none of the applicants actually existed or desired to purchase the insurance, and premiums were never received. Because the applications were false and material misstatements of fact, the agent was charged with violating Florida Insurance Code prohibiting fraudulent or dishonest practices in the conduct of business under the license. The agent's license was revoked and she is ineligible to reapply for 2 years.

Fraudulent Placement: License Revoked
In May 2016 a Melbourne agent licensed for life, health and variable insurance as well as as a customer service representative was found to have fraudulently represented himself as a general lines agent for the purpose of fraudulently transacting homeowners insurance. The investigation found that he collected premiums without completing applications, provided false evidence of coverage, and never placed the coverage with an insurer and allowed existing coverage to lapse. These activities are considered unfair or deceptive acts/practices under Florida law, engaging in fraudulent or dishonest practices in the conduct of business under the license or appointment, and misappropriating, converting, or unlawfully withholding moneys belonging to insurers or insureds received in conduct of business under the license. The agent's license was revoked and other disciplinary penalties are underway.

Transacting without a License: Suspension
In October, 2016, the Department alleged that an individual licensed as a life, health and variable annuity agent had solicited insurance business without possessing the proper licensure in violation of section 626.112.(2), Florida Statutes. Without admitting guilt, the agent agreed via a consent order to a fine of $2,500 and a license suspension for 3 months.

3. Important Terminology
Authorized or Unauthorized Insurer
In Florida, an authorized insurer is one that has been granted a certificate of authority to transact insurance in this state. An unauthorized insurer does not have a certificate of authority in Florida.

Certificate of Authority
A certificate of authority is a written agreement between an insurance company and a state or other jurisdiction that gives the insurance company the authority to transact insurance within that state or jurisdiction. The certificate of authority lists the lines of insurance the insurance company is authorized to transact.

Base Flood
A based flood (also referred to as a 100-year flood) is the flood that has a 1% chance of being equaled or exceeded in any given year.

Base Flood Elevation (BFE)
The base flood elevation is the elevation shown on a flood insurance rate map (FIRM) for special flood hazard areas that indicates the water surface elevation resulting from a base flood.

National Flood Insurance Program
The National Flood Insurance Program (NFIP) is a federal program that enables property owners in participating communities to purchase flood insurance. Flood insurance provided by the NFIP is designed as an alternative to disaster assistance.

Special Flood Hazard Area (SFHA)
A special flood hazard area (SFHA) is an area identified by FEMA as having a high-risk of flood and where flood insurance is mandatory for property secured by a federally regulated or insured lender. SFHAs are indicated in flood insurance rate maps as A and V flood zones.

Grandfather Rule
Under the NFIP, grandfathering is an exemption based on circumstances that existed previously and allows eligible buildings to receive subsidized flood insurance premium rates if they are remapped into special flood hazard areas (SFHAs) or if their base flood elevations are higher after remapping.

Best Interest Contract Exemption
Part of the DOL Conflict of Interest (Fiduciary) Rule. Requires advisors who limit recommendations to proprietary products to clearly notify the client in writing that the firm offers proprietary products or receives third-party payments for the recommended investment product. The client must also be informed of limitations the advisor may have to only recommend a specific group of products.

Fiduciary Standard
Being a fiduciary means that financial advisors will have to act in their clients' best interests regarding retirement accounts such as IRAs and 401(k) plans.

Suitability Standard
Advisers need to ensure that the financial product is suitable for the client's situation.

Insurance Terms and Related Concepts
Risk is uncertainty of loss.
Insurance is a transfer of risk from the insured to the insurer.
Pure risk means there is no chance of gain. Pure risk is insurable.
Speculative risk means there is a chance of a loss or a gain. Speculative risks are not insurable.
A hazard is something that increases the risk.
The principle of indemnity governs property and casualty policies. It states that the purpose of the policy is to restore the insured financially to where they were prior to their loss.
Insurable interest must exist on a casualty policy at time of loss in order for the policy to provide coverage.
The law of large numbers is used to predict the likelihood of loss.
Actual cash value is replacement cost minus depreciation.
Negligence is a tort, or a civil wrong; it is grounds for a lawsuit.
Negligence is the failure to act as a reasonable person would in the same set of circumstances.
An occurrence happens over a period of time.
A binder may be oral or written.
A binder provides coverage until the policy is issued.
A binder includes all coverages provided by the policy.
A warranty is a literal truth.
A representation is a substantial truth. In insurance, statements of the applicant/policyowner are representations – true to the best of their knowledge.
Concealment is an omission of a material fact.
The insurer has the right to sue a negligent third party for damages paid to an insured under the concept of subrogation.

Provisions and Contract Law
Policy Structure:
The four parts of a policy may be remembered by the acronym D-I-C-E (declarations, insuring agreement, conditions, and exclusions).
The declarations list the named insured, policy limits, and premium and policy period.
The limits of liability are found on the declaration page of the policy.
The insuring agreement describes the coverages provided.
The conditions list the obligations of both parties, the insurer and the insured.
The exclusions list the perils that are not covered.
Provisions and Clauses:
If the insurer and insured disagree that the liability policy does or does not provide coverage, the claim will go to arbitration.
In arbitration there are three arbitrators.
The cancellation provisions are found in the conditions section of the policy.
The insured must promptly tell the insurer about a claim.
The other insurance clause is also known as the pro-rata liability clause.
Pro-rata does not mean equal, it is proportionate.
Federal Regulations:
The Fair Credit Reporting Act protects consumers against the circulation of inaccurate or obsolete personal or financial information.
The Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act requires that a customer be given out a privacy notice at the time the customer relationship is initially established and thereafter annually.
 The Terrorism Risk Insurance Act (TRIA) applies to commercial policies only.

Dwelling Policy
The main difference between the various dwelling policy (DP) forms is the property perils insured against.
DP policies do not cover personal liability, although it can be added by adding an endorsement known as a Personal Liability Supplement for an additional premium charge.
DP policies contain general exclusions for damage due to war, nuclear hazard, and flood but not wind.
On a dwelling policy, other structures coverage will apply to a structure rented out as a private garage.
DP policies do not cover breakage of glass after 60 days of vacancy.
DP policies do not cover freezing of plumbing unless the heat was left on.
The land on which the insured dwelling sits is not insurable.
Inflation guard, also known as the automatic increase endorsement, must be added to a DP policy by endorsement.
A loss from rain or dust would only be covered if an opening in the dwelling roof or walls was first created by wind or another covered cause of loss.
When a dwelling is covered by more than one policy, losses are shared pro-rata under the other insurance clause. This may also be referred to as the pro-rata liability clause.
The Basic dwelling form DP-1 is a named or specified peril policy.
The DP-1 basic form does not provide additional living expense under coverage D; only fair rental value is provided.
The Extended Coverage Endorsement is added to the Standard Fire Policy to create the DP-1.
A DP-2 Broad Form policy is named perils on both the dwelling and the contents.
On the dwelling broad form DP-2 building structures (Coverages A and B) are written with an 80% coinsurance requirement.
On a DP-2 broad form, Coverage B (other structures) is in addition to other coverage limits.
The DP-3 policy will provide the same coverage as the DP-2 (contents broad) for personal property coverage, should coverage for contents be declared.
Although the DP-1 Basic Form does not provide coverage for trees, shrubs, plants and lawns, both the DP-2 and DP-3 do.
When a dwelling policy is referred to as DP-2 ('02), it is referring to the Dwelling Property Broad Form policy. The ('02) means it is the ISO policy form that was introduced in 2002.

Homeowners Policy
All HO policies are package policies combining property and liability coverages.
The most a policy will pay under the liability section is known as the limit of liability.
The definition of an insured includes residents of a household who are relatives, or any other person under age 21 who is in the insured's care.
All HO policies exclude coverage for flood, landslides or mudslides.
The homeowners policy does not cover theft of animals, birds or fish.
Personal injury liability for false arrest, libel, slander, defamation, and invasion of privacy is not automatically covered on an HO, but can be added by endorsement for an additional premium.
The land on which a house sits is not insurable on HO policies.
Section II (liability) provides additional coverage for damage to the property of others up to $1,000 per occurrence.
An HO policy will not cover the property of a boarder/renter, but will cover the property of a guest or residence employee.
An HO policy will provide coverage for contents anywhere in the world, including theft.
An HO policy written on a dwelling under the course of construction will not cover theft.
Medical coverage will cover charges for medical, surgical, x-ray, dental, ambulance, hospital, nursing, prosthetic devices and funeral services.
Medical payments never apply to regular members of the household.
The bankruptcy of an insured does not relieve the insurer of their obligations under the policy.
Claims resulting from the enforcement of an ordinance or law are not covered by most property policies, although limited coverage is provided as additional coverage.
The insurer's duty to defend a lawsuit is stated in the insuring agreement.
Additional coverages (such as for trees, shrubs and plants) are in addition to limits.
HO liability covers bodily injury to a third party.
If the insurer cancels an HO policy, they must send advance written notice to both the mortgage company and the named insured.
An HO policy will not pay the cost of defense on an excluded claim.
An HO policy covers contents in full while moving, for up to 30 days.
HO Coverage C will not cover property of a roomer, boarder or other tenant unless related to the insured.
Damage due to rain is not covered on a property policy unless the roof or wall was first damaged by wind or hail, allowing the rain to enter.
Property policies do not cover damage to motorized vehicles, other than those used to maintain the premises (e.g. riding lawn mowers).
Personal liability and medical coverage cover the insured's activities both on and off the premises.
Loss of use covers only additional living expenses.
The insurer's duty to defend a lawsuit ends when the amount paid out for damages equals the limit of liability.
A person who is hired to maintain a premises is referred to as a residence employee.
At the insured's option, recovered property will be returned to the insured or retained by the insurer. If returned, the loss payment must be adjusted.
After a loss, if the cost of reconstructing a home exceeds its market value, the insurer will consider it to be a constructive total loss.
HO-2 is named peril on both the dwelling and contents.
HO-3 is all-risk on a dwelling, but named peril on its contents.
In the HO-3 special form policy, theft of personal property of a resident employee is covered.
HO-4 are property policies issued to tenants to cover contents extend coverage to losses caused by a covered peril to improvements, alterations and additions made to the described location at the tenant's expense.
On HO-6 policy, contents coverage is named perils.
HO-6 (unit-owners form) does not cover common area buildings.
HO-8 was created specifically for older homes.

Personal Auto
Liability:
Liability covers BI and PD to others for which an insured is proven to be negligent.
The Auto Assigned Risk Plan provides a method for those who have been rejected in the normal market to obtain coverage.
All authorized insurers selling auto insurance must participate in the Auto Assigned Risk Plan.
Supplementary payments under a PAP do not cover the insured's loss of earnings except when the insured is attending a hearing or trial at the insurer's request. The insured's injuries are not covered.
The personal auto coverage form will provide coverage for radios and tape decks if they are permanently installed in the dash.
The medical payment section of the personal automobile policy pays necessary medical and funeral expenses caused by an accident and sustained by an insured.
The medical payments coverage found in the personal automobile policy will not pay for lost wages.
Auto medical on a PAP protects the insured and passengers in the car. It is an optional coverage. It is not a supplementary payment, and it is no-fault.
On a PAP, an at-fault driver's injuries would be covered by medical.
Physical Damage:
Coverage D on a PAP is called coverage for damage to an insured's car and is optional. It is divided into collision and other than collision.
Other than collision coverage is also known as comprehensive coverage.
Coverage D is written on an ACV basis and has a deductible. Collision coverage on the PAP covers colliding with another object, rollover and upset. Everything else is covered by other than collision coverage.
Hitting a pole with an insured automobile would be an example of a collision.
Hitting a deer is an example of other than collision.
If a bird were to hit the insured's windshield, the windshield is covered under other than collision on a PAP.
Towing and labor is an optional coverage on the PAP and costs extra.
The optional coverage limit for towing and labor pays on a per event/occurrence basis.
In an accident, the owner's PAP is always the primary policy; the driver's PAP, if different, is always the excess policy.
Uninsured Motorists:
Insureds purchase uninsured motorist coverage because of their concern of being in an auto accident with someone who has no insurance and is at-fault.
Included in the definition of an uninsured motorist is a hit-and-run driver, one whose insurer has gone bankrupt, and one who does not carry the state minimum limits.
If an individual is concerned about being in an auto accident with someone who has inadequate limits of liability and who is at-fault, they would purchase underinsured motorist coverage.
Exclusions:
A PAP does not provide coverage in Mexico.
A PAP does not cover an insured's property in transit.
Auto medical covers the insured and any passengers, but not injured pedestrians.
A PAP will cover small pick-up trucks, even if they are used for farming or ranching, but will not cover motorcycles, dump trucks or farm implements driven on the highway.
On the PAP, exclusions under other than collision include wear and tear, freezing and mechanical breakdown.
The PAP does not cover autos used as taxis or livery, but carpools are covered.

Other Property and Liability Coverages
A mobile home endorsement modifies an HO policy to cover a mobile home and other structures while located on the mobile home resident's owned or leased land.
A mobile home policy pays up to $500 if moved by the insured to a safe area, to protect it from losses caused by a covered peril.
Watercraft coverage pays for bodily injury or property damage resulting from the use of any watercraft, outboard motors, or watercraft trailers.
Medical payments to others under a watercraft policy covers expenses arising from medical and funeral services sustained by an insured, as long as the services rendered occur within 3 years of the accident date.
Windstorm coverage applies to losses arising from high risk areas often require a separate windstorm policy.
For states in which private insurers do not offer windstorm policies, a state-sponsored insurance pool would provide coverage.
For standard policy forms which exclude coverage for earthquake damage, coverage for said peril may be added by endorsement.
Inland marine coverage can be written on almost any type of property that is portable, and in transit over land or in the air.
Personal inland marine policies are often called floaters. 
The scheduled personal property endorsement is used to insure personal property with high values such as furs, antiques, and jewelry.
Inland Marine:
A list of risks eligible for inland marine insurance published by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC) is known as the Nationwide Definition.
On equipment breakdown insurance, the insurer may inspect the insured's equipment, but they are not required to.
The scheduled personal property endorsement is used to insure personal property with high values such as furs, antiques, and jewelry.
To properly insure computer equipment, an individual would buy a data processing floater.
A fine arts floater will provide automatic coverage for newly acquired fine art for 90 days.
A scheduled personal property floater provides coverage on an ACV basis.
In case of a loss to a pair or set, the insurer may elect to repair or replace the set to its value before the loss, or pay the difference in value before and after the loss. To calculate the difference, the insurer would subtract the value of remaining from the value of the full set.
National Flood Insurance Program (NFIP):
The FIA (Federal Insurance Administration) sets flood insurance rates. To qualify for NFIP, a community must cooperate with the FIA.
Flood is defined as the temporary inundation of normally dry land.
Flood insurance will not cover wharves, piers or docks.
NFIP flood insurance does not cover sewer backup or seepage through walls.
Flood insurance is sold by the government and by participating private insurers, but claims are paid by the federal government.
The maximum coverage permitted under the regular NFIP program is $250,000 for a single-family home.
To be eligible for federal flood insurance, the community must participate in the NFIP.
Umbrella and Excess Liability:
A personal umbrella liability policy will pay on an excess basis, only after a primary policy has already paid.
An excess limits policy, such as an umbrella, is one written over and above the primary liability policy's limits of insurance.
Umbrella policies contain a retention requirement that is like a deductible and must be paid by the insured in the event of a claim.
Umbrella policies are not written on standardized industry forms.
On a personal umbrella policy, the retained limit is defined as the policy limits of the primary policies.

Abandonment
The abdication of insured property into the hands of another, or into the possession of no one in particular.
Absolute Liability
A type of liability that occurs due to extremely dangerous operations, such as the use of explosives or working at extreme heights.
Accident
An unplanned, unforeseen event which occurs suddenly and at a specific place.
Actual Cash Value (ACV)
The required amount to pay damages or for property loss, which is calculated based on the property's current replacement value minus depreciation.
Additional Coverage
A provision in an insurance policy that allows for more coverage for specific loss expense without increase in premium.
Additional Insureds
Individuals or businesses that are not named as insured on the declaration page, but are protected by the policy, usually in regard to a specific interest.
Adhesion
A contract offered on a "take-it-or-leave-it" basis by an insurer, in which the insured's only option is to accept or reject the contract. Any ambiguities in the contract will be settled in favor of the insured.
Admitted Insurer
An insurance company authorized and licensed to transact business in a particular state.
Adverse Selection
The tendency of risks with higher probability of loss to purchase and maintain insurance more often than the risks who present lower probability.
Agent
An individual who is licensed to sell, negotiate, or effect insurance contracts on behalf of an insurer.
Aggregate Limit
The maximum limit of coverage available under a liability policy during a policy year regardless of the number of claims that may be made or the number of accidents that may occur.
Agreed Value
A property policy with a provision agreed upon by the insurer and insured as to the amount of insurance that represents a fair valuation for the property at the time the insurance is written.
Aleatory
A contract in which the participating parties agree to exchange unequal amounts. Insurance contracts are aleatory in that the amount the insured will pay in premiums is unequal to the amount the insurer will pay in the event of a loss.
Alien Insurer
An insurance company that is incorporated outside the United States.
Apparent Authority
The appearance or the assumption of authority based on the actions, words, or deeds of the principal or because of circumstances the principal created.
Appraisal
An assessment of property to determine either the correct amount of insurance to be written or the amount of loss to be paid.
Arbitration
Method of claim settlement used when the insured and insurer cannot agree upon the amount of the loss.
Assignment
The transfer of a legal right or interest in an insurance policy. In property and casualty insurance, assignments of policies are usually valid only with the prior written consent of the insurer.
Authorized Insurer
An insurance company that has qualified and received a Certificate of Authority from the Department of Insurance to transact insurance in the state.
Auto
A land motor vehicle, trailer or semi-trailer designed for use on public roads, including attached machinery or equipment; auto does not include mobile equipment.
Avoidance
A method of dealing with risk by deliberately keeping away from it (e.g., if a person wanted to avoid the risk of dying in an airplane crash, they might choose never to fly in a plane).
Bailee
A person or entity that has possession of personal property entrusted to them by the owner. For example, a television repair person that has possession of a customer's television would be a bailee.
Beneficiary
The person who receives the proceeds from the insurance policy.
Binder
A temporary contract that puts an insurance policy into force before the premium has been paid.
Blanket Bond
A type of bond that covers losses caused by dishonest employees.
Blanket Insurance
A single property insurance policy that provides coverage for multiple classes of property at one location, or provides coverage for one or more classes of property at multiple locations.
Bodily Injury Liability
Legal liability arising from death or physical trauma to a person as a result of a negligent or purposeful act and omissions by an insured.
Boycott
An unfair trade practice in which one person refuses to do business with another until they agree to certain conditions.
Builder's Risk Coverage Form
A commercial property form that covers buildings under construction.
Building and Personal Property Coverage Form
A commercial property form that covers buildings, and/or their contents.
Burglary
The forced entry into another's premises with felonious intent.
Cancellation
The termination of an in-force insurance policy by either the insured or the insurer prior to the expiration date shown in the policy.
Casualty Insurance
A type of insurance that covers losses caused by injury to persons or damage to the property of others.
Cease and Desist Order
A demand of a person to stop committing an action that is in violation of a provision.
Certificate of Authority
A document that authorizes a company to start conducting business and specifies the kind(s) of insurance a company can transact. It is illegal for an insurance company to transact insurance without this certificate.
Certificate of Insurance
A legal document that indicates that an insurance policy has been issued, and that states both the amounts and types of insurance provided.
Claim
A demand made by the insured to cover a loss protected by the insurance policy.
Class Rating
The practice of computing a price per unit of insurance that applies to all applicants possessing a given set of characteristics.
Coercion
An unfair trade practice in which an insurer uses physical or mental force to persuade an applicant to buy insurance.
Coinsurance
An agreement between an insurer and insured in which both parties are expected to pay a certain portion of the potential loss and other expenses.
Combined Single
A single dollar limit of liability applying to the total of damages for bodily injury and property damage combined, resulting from one accident or occurrence.
Commercial Lines
Type of insurance that pertains to business, mercantile or manufacturing establishments.
Commissioner (Superintendent, Director)
The chief executive and administrative officer of a state insurance department.
Common Law
An unwritten body of law based on past judicial decisions as well as usages and customs.
Complaint
A written statement of a liability claim given by the claimant; a reason for a lawsuit.
Components
Factors that determine rates, including loss reserves, loss adjusting expenses, operating expenses and profits.
Comprehensive Coverage
Also known as Other Than Collision coverage, it covers losses by fire, theft, vandalism, falling objects, etc.
Concealment
The withholding of known facts which, if material, can void a contract.
Concurrent causation
Multiple events leading to one loss.
Conditional Contract
A type of an agreement in which both parties must perform certain duties and follow rules of conduct to make the contract enforceable.
Conditions
The section of an insurance policy that indicates the general rules or procedures that the insurer and insured agree to follow under the terms of the policy.
Consideration
The binding force in a contract that requires something of value to be exchanged for the transfer of risk. The consideration on the part of the insured is the representations made in the application and the payment of premium; the consideration on the part of the insurer is the promise to pay in the event of loss.
Consultant
A person who, for a fee, offers any advice, counsel, opinion, or service regarding the benefits, advantages, or disadvantages promised under a policy of insurance.
Consumer Reports
Written and /or oral statements regarding a consumer's credit, character, reputation, or habits collected by a reporting agency from employment records, credit reports, and other public sources.
Contract
An agreement between two or more parties enforceable by law.
Controlled Business
An entity that obtains and possesses a license solely for the purpose of writing business on the owner, immediate family, relatives, employer and employees.
Declarations
The section of an insurance policy containing the basic underwriting information, such as the insured's name, address, amount of coverage and premiums, and a description of insured locations, as well as any supplemental representations by the insured.
Deductible
The portion of the loss that is to be paid by the insured before any claim benefits may be paid by the insurer.
Defamation
An unfair trade practice in which one agent or insurer makes an injurious statement about another with the intent of harming the person’s or company’s reputation.
Deposit Premium Audit
A condition that allows the insurer to audit the insured's books or records at the end of the policy term to make sure adequate premium has been collected for the exposure.
Depreciation
The lessening of value of real and personal property due to age and wear and tear.
Direct Losses
Physical damage to buildings and/or personal property as a result of direct consequence of a particular peril.
Director (Commissioner, Superintendent)
The head of the state department of insurance.
Disability
A physical or mental impairment, either congenital or resulting from an injury or sickness.
Disclosure
An act of identifying the name of the producer, representative or firm, limited insurance representative, or temporary insurance producer on any policy solicitation.
Domestic Insurer
An insurance company that is incorporated in the state.
Domicile of Insurer
Insurer's location of incorporation and the legal ability to write business in a state.
Economic Loss
The estimated total cost (both insured and uninsured) of an accident.
Endorsement
A printed addendum to a contract that is used to change the policy's original terms, conditions, or coverages.
Estoppel
A legal impediment to denying a fact or restoring a right that has been previously waived.
Excess Policy
A policy that only pays for loss after the primary policy has paid its limit.
Exclusions
Causes of loss, exposures, conditions, etc. listed in the policy for which the benefits will not be paid.
Exclusive or Captive Agent
An agent who represents only one company and is compensated by commissions.
Experience Rating
Method of determining the premium based on the insured's own past loss experience.
Exposure
A unit of measure used to determine rates charged for insurance coverage.
Express Authority
The authority granted to an agent by means of the agent's written contract.
Extensions of Coverage
A provision in some property policies which allows the extension of a major coverage to certain types of loss to property not specifically insured.
FAIR Plan
Fair Access to Insurance Requirements plan is a state-run program that makes insurance obtainable to those in high risk areas who have been unable to acquire insurance through other channels.
Fiduciary
An agent/broker who handles insurer's funds in a trust capacity.
First Named Insured
The individual whose name appears first on the policy's declaration
Flood
A general and temporary condition of partial or complete inundation of normally dry land areas from overflow of inland or tidal waters or from the unusual and rapid accumulation or runoff of surface waters from any source.
Foreign Insurer
An insurance company that is incorporated in another state.
Fraternal Benefit Society
A life or health insurance company formed to provide insurance for members of an affiliated lodge, religious, or fraternal organization with a representative form of government.
Fraud
Intentional misrepresentation or deceit with the intent to induce a person to part with something of value.
Functional Replacement Cost
The cost to replace damaged property with less expensive and more modern construction or equipment.
Gross Negligence
Reckless behavior that shows disregard for the safety or lives of others.
Hazard
A circumstance that increases the likelihood of a loss.
Hazard, Moral
The effect of a person’s reputation, character, or living habits on their insurability.
Hazard, Morale
The effect a person’s indifference concerning loss has on the risk to be insured.
Hazard, Physical
A type of hazard that arises from the physical characteristics of an individual, such as a physical disability due to either current circumstance or a condition present at birth.
Implied Authority
Authority that is not expressed or written into the contract, but which the agent is assumed to have in order to transact the business of insurance for the principal.
Indemnity
Compensation to the insured that restores them to the same financial position that they enjoyed prior to the loss.
Independent Agents
Agents that sell the insurance products of several companies and work for themselves or other agents.
Indirect Losses
Losses resulting from a peril, but not directly caused by it. Indirect losses may include business disruption, rent insurance, extra expenses, and other consequences that occur over time.
Inflation Guard
A coverage extension that automatically increases amounts of insurance on buildings by an agreed upon percentage annually.
Insurable Interest
Any interest an insured may have in property that is the subject of insurance, so that damage or destruction of that property would cause the insured financial loss.
Insurance
The transfer of the possibility of a loss (risk) to an insurance company, which in turn spreads the costs of unexpected losses to many individuals.
Insurance Policy
A contract between an insured and an insurance company which agrees to pay the insured for loss caused by specific events.
Insured
The person or organization that is protected by insurance; the party to be indemnified.
Insured Contract
A definition on liability forms that describes the types of contracts in which liability is assumed by the insured and included for coverage in the policy. Examples of insured contracts are leases of premises, elevator maintenance agreements, easement agreements, and other agreements related to the insured's business.
Insurer
An entity that indemnifies against losses, provides benefits, or renders services (also known as the "company" or "insurance company").
Insuring Agreement
The section of an insurance policy containing the insurer's promise to pay, the description of coverage provided and perils insured against.
Intentional Tort
Any deliberate act that causes harm to another person.
Interline Endorsement
A written amendment designed to eliminate redundancy and minimize the number of endorsements in the policy.
Judgment Rating
An approach used when credible statistics are lacking or when the exposure units are so varied that it is impossible to construct a class.
Law of Large Numbers
A principle stating that the larger the number of similar exposure units considered, the more closely the losses reported will equal the underlying probability of loss.
Legal Liability
A liability under the law that occurs when a person is responsible for injuries or damages to another due to negligence.
Liability
Responsibility under the law.
Liberalization
A property insurance clause that extends broader legislated or regulated coverage to current policies, as long as it does not result in a higher premium.
Lien
A charge, security or encumbrance on property.
Limit of Liability
The maximum amount for which an insurer is liable.
Lloyd's Associations
Organizations that provide support facilities for underwriters or groups of individuals that accept insurance risk.
Loss
The reduction, decrease, or disappearance of value of the person or property insured in a policy, by a peril insured against.
Loss Payable Clause
A provision in property insurance that is used to cover the interest of a secured lender in personal property.
Loss Ratio
A calculation used by insurance companies to relate income from loss expenses: loss ratio = (incurred losses + loss adjusting expense) / earned premium.
Loss Valuation
A factor in determining the premium charged and the amount of insurance required.
Market Value
A seldom used method of valuing a loss based upon the amount a willing buyer would pay to a willing seller for the property prior to the loss.
Misrepresentation
A false statement or lie that can render the contract void.
Monoline Policy
A policy written separately as a single coverage.
Mutual Assessment Insurer
A mutual insurance company with the right to assess policyholder's additional amounts of premium to meet operational needs.
Mutual Companies
Insurance organizations that have no capital stock, but are owned by the policyholders.
Mysterious Disappearance
A disappearance of property that cannot be explained as to the location, time or the manner of property loss.
Named Insured
The individual(s) whose name appears on the policy's declaration.
Named Peril
The cause of loss specifically covered by the insurance policy. No coverage is provided for unlisted perils.
Negligence
The failure to use the care that a reasonable, prudent person would under the same or similar circumstances.
No Benefit to the Bailee
A provision that excludes any assignment or granting of any policy provision to any person or organization holding, storing, repairing, or moving insured property for a fee.
Nonadmitted Insurer
An insurance company that has not applied, or has applied and been denied a Certificate of Authority and may not transact insurance.
Nonconcurrency
A situation in which other insurance is written on the same risk, but not on the same coverage basis.
Nonrenewal
A termination of a policy by an insurer on the anniversary or renewal date.
Notice of Claim
A provision that spells out an insured’s duty to provide the insurer with reasonable notice in the event of a loss.
Occurrence
A broader definition of loss, which differs from accident in that it includes losses caused by continuous or repeated exposure to conditions resulting in injury to persons or damage to property that is neither intended nor expected.
Open Peril
Term used in property insurance to describe the breadth of coverage provided under an insurance policy form that insures against "any risk of loss" that is not specifically excluded.
Pair and Set Clause
A clause included in many property and inland marine policies, which provides that the insurer is not obligated to pay for the total value of a set of items if only one item has been lost, damaged or destroyed.
Partnership
A legal entity in which 2 or more persons agree to share the profits and losses of the business.
Passive
A description of an anti-theft device or system for autos which is activated automatically when the driver turns the ignition key to the off position and the key is removed.
Peril
The cause of a possible loss.
Personal Injury Liability
Legal responsibility for an injury to the character of another person caused by libel, slander, false arrest, invasion of privacy and other acts.
Personal Lines
Insurance – Type of coverage available to individuals and families for non-business risks.
Policy Limits
The maximum amount an insured may collect, or for which an insured is protected under the terms of the policy.
Policy Period
A period of time a policy is in effect (also known as Policy Term).
Policyholder
The person in possession of an insurance policy; may or may not be the policyowner and/or insured.
Policyowner
The person who is entitled to exercise the rights and privileges in the policy. This person may or may not be the insured.
Premium
A periodic payment to the insurance company to keep the policy in force.
Primary Policy
A basic, fundamental insurance policy which pays first with respect to other outstanding policies.
Pro Rata
Proportional distribution of shares of the loss for each insurance policy written on a piece of property.
Producer
A person who acts on the behalf of the insurer to sell, negotiate, or effect insurance contracts; also known as an agent.
Proof of Loss
A sworn statement that must usually be furnished by the insured to an insurer before any loss under a policy can be paid.
Property Damage Liability
Legal liability arising from physical damage to tangible property of others caused by the negligence of an insured.
Proximate Cause
An act or event that is the immediate or actual cause of a loss.
Pure Risk
Situations that can only result in a loss or no change. Pure risk is the only type of risk insurance companies are willing to accept.
Rebating
Any inducement offered in the sale of insurance products that is not specified in the policy.
Reciprocal
Insurance resulting from an interchange of reciprocal agreements of indemnity among persons known as subscribers.
Reduction
Lessening the possibility or severity of a loss.
Reinsurance
A form of insurance whereby one insurance company (the reinsurer) in consideration of a premium paid to it, agrees to indemnify another insurance company (the ceding company) for part or all of its liabilities from insurance policies it has issued.
Replacement Cost
The cost to replace damaged property with like kind and quality at current price, without any deduction for depreciation.
Representations
Statements made by the applicant on the insurance application that are believed to be true, but are not guaranteed to be true.
Retention
A method of dealing with risk by intentionally or unintentionally keeping a portion of it for the insured's account; the amount of responsibility assumed but not reinsured by the insurance company.
Retrospective Rating
A self-rating plan under which the actual losses during the policy period determine the final premium (subject to a minimum and maximum premium).
Right of Salvage
A provision in property insurance policy requiring that after payment of a total loss to insured property, the insured must transfer the title (or ownership) to the property to the insurer.
Risk
Uncertainty as to the outcome of an event when two or more possibilities exist.
Risk, Pure
The uncertainty or chance of a loss occurring in a situation that can only result in a loss or no change.
Risk, Speculative
The uncertainty or chance of a loss occurring in a situation that involves the opportunity for either loss or gain.
Robbery
The taking of property from another by using violence or the threat of violence.
Salvage
The amount of money realized from the sale of damaged merchandise or property. A salvage clause is found in ocean marine insurance and usually states that the rescuers of a ship are entitled to the salvage of the ship and cargo.
Settlement
The process by which an agreement is reached and a claim is resolved in liability insurance.
Severability of Interests
A provision that insurance applies separately to each insured in a policy, treating each individual as the only insured.
Sharing
A method of dealing with risk for a group of individual persons or businesses with the same or similar exposure to loss who share the losses that occur within that group.
Specific Insurance
A property insurance policy that covers a specific kind or unit of property for a specific amount of insurance.
Speculative Risk
The uncertainty or chance of a loss occurring in a situation that involves the opportunity for either loss or gain.
Split
Separately stated limits of liability for different coverages, which may be stated on a per person, per occurrence, per policy period basis, or can be divided between bodily injury and property damage.
Stated Amount
An amount of insurance scheduled in a property policy which is not subject to any coinsurance requirements in the event of a covered loss.
Statute Law
The written law as enacted by a legislative body (i.e., the laws of the state), which generally takes precedence in cases where both common law and statute law apply.
Stock Companies
Companies owned by the stockholders whose investments provide the capital necessary to establish and operate the insurance company.
Strict Liability
A liability that refers to damages caused by defective products even though the manufacturer's fault or negligence cannot be proven.
Subrogation
The acquisition by an insurer of an insured's rights against any third party for indemnification of loss or other payment, to the extent that the insurer pays the loss.
Superintendent (Commissioner, Director)
The head of the state department of insurance.
Surety Bond
A guarantee that debts and obligations will be carried out, and the benefits will be paid for losses caused by nonperformance.
Surplus Lines
Insurance that is not available in the regular marketplace from admitted insurers.
Theft
Any act of stealing or removing property from its rightful owner. Theft encompasses both burglary and robbery.
Third-Party Provisions
Insurance provisions that address the rights of someone other than the policyowner to have a secured financial interest in the insured property.
Tort
A wrongful act or the violation of someone's rights that leads to legal liability. Torts are classified as intentional or unintentional (referred to as negligence).
Transfer
A basic principle of insurance under which the risk of financial loss is assigned to another party.
Twisting
A form of misrepresentation in which an agent persuades an insured/owner to cancel, lapse, or switch policies, even when it's to the insured's disadvantage.
Umbrella Liability Policy
Coverage that provides extra protection against liability, and excess amount of insurance above the primary policy.
Unauthorized Insurer
An insurance company that has not applied, or has applied and been denied a Certificate of Authority.
Underinsured Motorist Coverage
Coverage in an automobile insurance policy under which the insurer will pay costs up to specified limits for bodily injury if the liable driver's policy limits are exhausted and the driver cannot pay the full amount for which they are liable.
Underwriter
A person who evaluates and classifies risks to accept or reject them on behalf of the insurer.
Underwriting
The process of reviewing, accepting or rejecting applications for insurance.
Unilateral Contract
A contract that legally binds only one party to contractual obligations after the premium is paid.
Uninsured Motorist Coverage
Coverage that allows the named insured, resident relative(s) and passengers in a covered auto to collect sums another driver would be legally liable to pay for bodily injury resulting from an auto accident, providing the accident was caused by an uninsured motorist, a hit-and-run driver or a driver whose insurance company is insolvent.
Unintentional Tort
The result of acting without proper care, generally referred to as negligence.
Unoccupied
A property that has contents or furnishings in it, but is not being used or lived in.
Utmost Good Faith
The fair and equal bargaining by both parties in forming the contract, where the applicant must make full disclosure of risk to the company, and the insurance company must be fair in underwriting the risk.
Vacant
A property that has no contents, furnishings, or occupants.
Valued Policy
A policy used when it is difficult to establish the actual cash value of insured property after a loss occurs because of its rarity or uniqueness. A valued policy provides for payment of the full policy amount in the event of a total loss without regard to actual value or depreciation.
Vicarious Liability
A type of liability in which one person is responsible for the acts of another. For example, employers may be vicariously liable for the actions of their employees, and parents may be held responsible for negligent acts of their children.
Waiting Period
Time between the beginning of a disability and the start of disability insurance benefits.
Waiver
The voluntary abandonment of a known or legal right or advantage.
Warranty
A material stipulation in the policy that if breached may void coverage.
Workers Compensation
Benefits required by state law to be paid to an employee by an employer in the case of injury, disability, or death as the result of an on-the-job hazard.
